

Louisiana.gov - Government























 > Government > For State Employees 


























Services

|

Government

|

Business

|
Explore



Agencies

|

FAQs

|
Contact Us















 
Home









Executive Branch
Legislative Branch
Judicial Branch
Departments
Agency Directory
Boards and Commissions
For State Employees




Online Services



Questions? Ask Louise
Birth Certificates
Census and Demographics 
E-Mail Notifications
Employment
File State Taxes
Hunting/Fishing License
 LEO: LA Employees Online
 Services Directory
State Government Directory
State Park Reservations
Travel Info & Traffic Cameras
Unclaimed Property

> more ...


For State Employees 


Employment & Training | State Facilities | Health & Insurance | Retirement | Credit Unions

 

 State Employment and Training



Emergency Office Closure Information 
 
After an emergency or weather related state office closure, a toll free advisory number will be activated. For the office closure advisory, dial 800-360-9660 (outside Baton Rouge) or 225-342-0498 (within Baton Rouge).




LEO
 
Louisiana Employees Online (LEO):  Payroll, benefits, emergency contact, employee and training information. Questions or problems? 




LaGov ERP
 
LaGov ERP Single Sign-on Portal




State Employee Webmail 
 
Louisiana Statewide Email web access is available to all state agencies currently enrolled in the service. Interested in signing up your agency for Statewide E-mail? 




Civil Service
 
Job descriptions, classifications, pay rates, rules, downloadable forms, Job Search, FAQs, holidays/leave, retirement
       
Job Seeker Resources 
The Bridge: Quarterly Department newsletter 
 




CPTP
 
Comprehensive Public Training Program (CPTP) is the state-funded training program for state employees; view course descriptions, schedules, and download registration forms



Payroll Calendars


  Pay Periods Table: 2015; 2016; 2017; 2018
  State Uniform Payroll (OSUP) Calendar: 2015; 2016; 2017; 2018 




Employee Purchase Program
 

Computer and mobile phone service discounts 



Ethics

Public servants and elected officials are required to take one hour of training per calendar year on the Code of Governmental Ethics pursuant to LA R.S.42:1170A.  Elected officials are additionally required to receive one hour of training per term of office on the Campaign Finance Disclosure Acts.  Training is provided online at:

          http://eap.ethics.la.gov/EthicsTraining/login.aspx          

 

Government Contacts

Departments;
        Telephone Directory




State Library
 
Online catalog and employee access to abstracts, indexes and articles Answers to questions and help with information needs for state employees.




State Travel Guide

State Travel Policies and Procedures; Pocket Guide to Travel




 State Facilities




State Buildings Facilities Manual


Information and Guidelines for State Building Tenants.
 

Claiborne Conference Center

Conference and computer training space scheduling

Claiborne Cafe
Driving directions and parking
Request a room online



 



Health and Insurance Information




Health and Insurance Benefits

Health Insurance and other benefits information, including the Flexible Benefits Plan




Insurance Payroll Deductions


Miscellaneous Insurance products available for payroll deduction




Group Benefits
State Employee Benefit Online Information Service and  health plans

 



Retirement Information




LASERS: State Employee Retirement


Information for active and retired employees




Teacher's Retirement System


Downloadable newsletters, brochures and forms 




Deferred Compensation Plan

Plan members can check investment performance, and guests may check general fund information




Retired State Employees Association


Official web site of Retired State Employees Association
 


 Credit Unions




LaCap Federal Credit Union


Online banking, bill-paying, contacts and toll free numbers. Assistance: 800-522-2748 or 225-342-5055; TEL-A-CAP: 800-835-2227 or 225-342-9123




Campus Federal Credit Union

Online banking, Toll Free: 888-769-8841, Information and Contact Numbers



DOCCU: Corrections Credit Union


Main Office Phone: 225-342-6618 and Audio Response: 877-362-7005; Online banking: DOCCU@Home 




Eagle Louisiana Federal


Information and bill payment, Toll free at: 1-888-281-8485
 


Lawilifie State Credit Union


Wildlife and Fisheries Credit Union, 2000 Quail Drive, Baton Rouge, LA 70808; Phone: 225-765-2859, Fax: 225-765-0850, Audio teller banking: 225-763-3555




LES Federal Credit Union


Online banking, Phone: 225-342-3288, Toll free: 800-259-3291



Pelican State Credit Union


Online banking, bill-paying, Toll free: 1-800-351-4877, Local: 225-408-6100          



Search for Civil Service Jobs in Your Area


Civil Service Jobs: More Information

Search for current job openings
Subscribe for electronic notification of new job postings by category
View state governmental jobs by:

 Occupational Group
 Job Title
 Pay Schedule/Level 




2017 State Holiday Calendar 
Louisiana Revised Statute 1:55 declares days of public rest and legal holidays. See Also: Dates proclaimed as holidays by the Governor as found in Civil Service "General Circulars."


Holiday
Always falls on...
Date in 2017


New Year's Day 
January 1
Monday, Jan. 2


Martin Luther King, Jr. Day
3rd Monday in January
Monday, Jan. 16


Mardi Gras Day
Tuesday before Ash Wednesday
Tuesday, Feb. 28


Good Friday
Friday before Easter
 Friday, April 14


Memorial Day*
Last Monday in May
Monday, May 29

Independence Day
July 4
Tuesday, July 4


Labor Day
1st Monday in September
Monday, Sept. 4


Veterans' Day
November 11
Friday, Nov. 10


Thanksgiving Day
4th Thursday in November
Thursday, Nov. 23


Christmas Day
December 25
Monday, Dec. 25


*  
      Inauguration Day is a holiday in the city of Baton Rouge once every four years, and Memorial Day shall be annually proclaimed as a legal holiday as specified in R.S.1.55. General Election Day is a state holiday the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in even-numbered years.












Home

Policies

Site Map


  Contact Us 
 

Email the Webmaster

















SAP NetWeaver Portal














































User *








														   Ex. P00654321
													





Password *








														   Case sensitive
													












																Forgot password? Locked?
															


  


 																										
												



 







							        		 

First Time User?






Online Help






System Availability






System Requirements































Louisiana.gov - Government























 > Government > Departments 


























Services

|

Government

|

Business

|
Explore



Agencies

|

FAQs

|
Contact Us















 
Home









Executive Branch
Legislative Branch
Judicial Branch
Departments
Agency Directory
Boards and Commissions
For State Employees




Online Services



Questions? Ask Louise
Birth Certificates
Census and Demographics 
E-Mail Notifications
Employment
File State Taxes
Hunting/Fishing License
 LEO: LA Employees Online
 Services Directory
State Government Directory
State Park Reservations
Travel Info & Traffic Cameras
Unclaimed Property

> more ...








Branches  
Departments

Agency Directory

Boards & Commissions





Departments of the Executive Branch


 Quick Links:




Administration
Agriculture & Forestry
Attorney General
Children and Family Services
Civil Service
Culture, Recreation & Tourism
Economic Development
Education
 


Environmental Quality
Governor
Health
Insurance
Natural Resources
Public Safety and    Corrections
Public Service Commission
Revenue



Secretary of State
Transportation & Development
Treasury
Veterans Affairs
Wildlife & Fisheries
Workforce Commission



Division of Administration 
DOA, a division
              serving under the Governor, is the central management and administrative support agency for 
			  the State.  The Division is headed by the Commissioner of Administration and is comprised of 
			  three programs: Executive Administration; Community Development and Block Grant; and Auxiliary. 
			  The Commissioner oversees and coordinates the Division's 25 sections, which perform 
			  legislatively-mandated and other required functions of state government. 
			  The Division of Administration also provides supervisory functions for management 
			  and budgets of all state departments.

Department of Agriculture and Forestry LDAF, a department serving under the commissioner of agriculture, an elected official, is responsible for the development and growth of markets for Louisiana agricultural products. It provides agricultural and environmental services, pesticide waste control, agro-consumer services, animal health services, and forestry programs. LDAF is also given the responsibility for promotion, protection, and advancement of agriculture, except research and educational functions expressly allocated to other departments.

Department of Children and Family Services 
DCFS, a department directly under the governor and civil service, provides social services programs, such as the food stamp program, child welfare,  and other public assistance programs.  The DCFS licenses day care and foster care facilities.  The process of adoption and the enforcement of child support both falls under DCFS's authority, as well as paternity establishment and parental eligibility determinations.
Department of Culture, Recreation, and Tourism
DCRT, a department directly under the lieutenant governor and civil service, is responsible for state parks and recreation and tourism development. It also sponsors the arts, historical and archaeological preservation, and cultural programs. State museums, the state library, and the depository for state public documents are also housed by DCRT.(C.R.T. Division of) Historic Preservation
Lieutenant Governor

State Museum
Department of Economic Development 
LED, a department directly under the governor and civil service, is charged with the overall improvement of Louisiana’s economy. It seeks industrial and commercial development, provides oversight for industrial tax exemptions, and funds research to support economic development.  LED encourages the state's economic diversification, including technology-driven economic development strategies.  It separately provides development services to small and medium sized businesses, job training assistance, and helps to develop export markets for Louisiana products.

Department of Education 
DOE, a department serves under the governor-appointed superintendent of education. The BESE Board of Elementary and Secondary Education was also established as a constitutionally-responsible body. DOE administers primary and secondary education, whereas the Board of Regents maintains governance of higher education. The Department of Education provides school and community programs, including student, school and community health and nutrition programs, transportation, community adult programs, and postsecondary and workforce development programs.  The Department of Education is responsible for student and school performance records, comprising of student and school standards, assessment, accountability, and assistance (including exceptional children). DOE provides functions relating to teachers and administrators, including assessment and evaluation, certification, and staff development. Financial assistance and scholarship programs are funded through DOE's budget.
Department of Environmental Quality 
DEQ, a department directly under the governor and civil service, is charged with the administration and and enforcement of environmental laws to ensure a healthful and safe environment.  This includes air quality, water quality, the regulation of solid and hazardous waste, and the regulation of radiation.

Department of Health 
Louisiana Department of Health  (LDH), a department directly under the governor and civil service, protects and  promotes health and ensures access to medical, preventive and rehabilitative  services for all citizens of the State of Louisiana. In coordination with the  LSU Health Sciences Center, local health departments, federally qualified  centers and others, LDH promotes health and medical services for uninsured and  medically indigent citizens. LDH administers the State Medicaid program, and  coordinates and provides facilities for mental health, addictive disorders,  public health services, and supports and services for people with developmental  disabilities.


Department of Insurance 
LDI, a department serving under the commissioner of insurance, an elected official, regulates insurance rates.  It also provides administration of state insurance code and health insurance research and development.
Department of Justice 
The Department of Justice serves under the state's attorney general,  an elected official. The attorney general serves to provide public protection (consumer, environmental, and insurance protection, anti-trust, securities, and family violence prevention).  The Justice Department provides civil legal services for the state and its agencies, including protection and assertion of rights of state, debt collection, public works litigation, legal protection of state lands, water bottoms, and natural resources.  Criminal law investigation and prosecution as permitted by the constitution are the responsibility of the Attorney General (criminal appeals, amicus curiae briefs, habeas corpus defense, assistance to district attorneys, public corruption, institutional and insurance fraud, and extraditions).  The Attorney General gives legal representation to the state and its agencies in court cases and legal services for state gaming regulatory bodies, as well as issuance of legal opinions.
Louisiana Workforce Commission (Formerly Department of Labor)   The Louisiana Workforce Commission, a commission directly under the governor and civil service, has programs to protect well-being of state’s workforce. It monitors employment security, provides unemployment compensation, aids with manpower evaluation and training, labor-manangement relations, and administration of the community services block grant. Workers’ compensation and labor market and occupational information are also the Workforce Commissions's duties. The Louisiana Workforce Investment Council (formerly Louisiana Workforce Commission) has become part of the reorganized workforce agency.
Department of Natural Resources 
DNR, a department directly under the governor and civil service, helps with the conservation, regulation, and development of state natural resources (except timber, fish, and wildlife, which are designated to the Department of WildLife and Fisheries). DNR also provides coastal restoration and management.
   Department of Public Safety and   Corrections  
  The Department of Public Safety  and the Department of Corrections are directly under the governor and civil service, houses the state police, state property security, and gaming control, whose responsibilities include the enforcement of criminal and traffic laws and weights and standards. The Department of Public Safety aids in fire prevention and protection, and provides services for motor vehicle registration, and drivers’ licenses.  The Department of Corrections supervises and maintains correctional institutions, the care, custody, and treatment of children adjudicated delinquent or needing supervision, probation and parole of adults, and the custody, evaluation, and rehabilitation of inmates and adjudicated juveniles.  
Department of Public Service  PSC, the Public Service Commission, comprises the Department of Public Service and is divided into five districts, each headed by a commissioner whom is a locally-elected official.
  Department of Revenue  LDR, a department directly under the governor and civil service, ensures the assessment, evaluation, and collection of state taxes. It also regulates alcoholic beverage control and charitable gaming.

Department of State
SOS, the office of the secretary of state whom is an elected official, comprises the Department of State. The Secretary of State is the chief election officer of the state. He administers state corporation and trademark laws, the preservation of official state archives, and the official registry of commissions.  SOS also maintains the historical dignity of state government landmarks including the Old State Capital and certain museums.  The Secretary of State is considered the keeper of the Great Seal of the State of Louisiana. He maintains a "First Stop Shop" for business licensing in Louisiana, and administers certain functions of the Uniform Commercial Code.  The Secretary of State's office holds custody of voting machines and provisions voter registration.
Department of State Civil Service 
DSCS, a department directly under the governor and civil service, is responsible for processing many state jobs. It provides administration and regulation of the state classified service and is headed by the Civil Service Commission, a seven-member body appointed by the governor.
 
Department of Transportation and Development 
DOTD, a department directly under the governor and civil service, is generally responsible for transportation within the state: airports, highways, bridges, railroads, waterways, intermodal transportation, public transportation, and mass transit. Public works and flood and drainage control also fall under DOTD's control.
Department of the Treasury 
The Department of the Treasury serves under the state treasurer, an elected official. Custody and disbursement of state funds, accounting, depository control, and investment of state funds are handled by the Department of the Treasury.  The Treasurer's office handles functions relating to the management, analysis, and control of state debt, including the issuance of bonds.  The Treasury may also lend assistance to certain retirement boards.
 Department of Veterans Affairs 
VA, a department directly under the governor and civil service, staffs the functions of the state's veterans service offices. The mission of the Louisiana Department of Veterans   Affairs is to assist Louisiana veterans and their dependents in receiving all federal and state benefits. Notable responsibilities include the Agent Orange Directory, domiciliary facilities for war veterans, and veterans cemeteries.  

Department of Wildlife and Fisheries 
LDWF, a department directly under the governor and civil service, sponsors programs related to wildlife and fish, including research and replenishment. LDWF maintains  natural wildlife areas within the state. Its agents patrol the scenic rivers and game preserves of Louisiana, providing regulation of hunting and fishing.  











Home

Policies

Site Map


  Contact Us 
 

Email the Webmaster





































Training
    - Online Training






















                    State Civil Service Site Search
            Advanced




                Font size









                    Home
                



                                Job Seekers
                            



jobs.la.gov





                                State Employees
                            



Charles E. Dunbar, Jr. Career Civil Service Award


Comprehensive Public Training Program


Corrective Actions


Employee Appeal Process


Job Information and Test Finder


Layoff Information for State Employees


Louisiana Employees Online (LEO)


Speaking Publicly on Issues


Supervisory Training Requirements


Webmail Access





                                HR Professionals
                            



Approved Promotional Zones


Article X: Civil Service Systems


Forms


Human Resources Weblinks


HR Handbook


HR Portal Sign In


LA Careers Sign In


Job Information and Test Finder


Performance Evaluation System (PES)


Quarterly HR Community Meeting Schedule


Transmittals





                                About Us / Divisions
                            



What is SCS?


Administration


Accountability


Appeals


Compensation


Employee Relations


Management Information Services


Staffing


Training & Workforce Development / CPTP














Quick Links


Appeals


Comprehensive Public Training Program (CPTP)


Job Information and Test Finder


LEO - Louisiana Employees Online


Performance Evaluation System (PES)


Publications, Notifications, Facts & Figures


SCS Commission


SCS General Circulars


SCS Rules


Subscriptions



                                            Workforce Development






                                Training - Online
    Training
                            

Training / CPTP Home
CPTP Learner

CPTP Course Catalog
Supervisory Training Requirements
Special Request Registration

Division Contacts

            
            
                    Phone Number: (225)342-8539
                    Fax Number: (225)219-1041
Dana LeBherz
Training Division Administrator
Dana.LeBherz@La.Gov
Glyn Hays
Assistant Division Administrator
Glyn.Hays@La.Gov
All Contacts...


Collapse All
Expand All

CPTP provides online training to state employees through
        LEO My Training.  You can find help for using LEO in the Quick Reference link
        on your LEO My Training page.  That link is on the left in the Navigation section:
    




        If you are having problems accessing
        a course or getting credit for a course completion, please make
        sure that you have the proper technical requirements set on your computer. To see
        the current LEO technical requirements, in LEO select the Home tab to get to the
        LEO Home Page.  From there, you can locate the LEO Technical Requirements’ link
        on the right side of the page in the Help section:
    





 Louisiana Employees Online (LEO)

Performance Evaluation System (PES)

CPTP provides training on the new Performance Evaluation System (PES) process. All
            PES courses are available online. The online PES courses are:

CPTP PES Basics
CPTP PES Planning Process
CPTP PES Evaluation Process


           The three courses, PES Basics, Planning, Planning, and Evaluation, are required for any classified employee who conducts the planning and evaluation (PES) for classified state employees.
            The courses must be completed within 90 days of hire or promotion/appointment to the supervisory role.

        
CPTP also provides the optional CPTP PES Forms course to help support supervisors
            while they complete the PES form.

            For questions about the PES process, please review the
            
    Performance Evaluation System
            section of the site.
        
PES Basics

            This web-based training program builds the foundation for employees to understand
            what a performance evaluation 
    system is, what are its features and benefits and why organizations use such systems.
        

Intended Audience:  State employees who have limited familiarity with performance
            evaluation systems or who would like to more 
    fully understand the rationale for using a performance evaluation system.
        
Availability: This course is available in LEO.  See below for directions.

PES Planning Process

            This web-based training program covers the specifics of the state’s PES Planning
            process from three different perspectives:  
    employees, supervisors, and 2nd Level Evaluators.  The process of the planning system is
            covered from beginning to end including:
        

Timeline of planning process
Parts of the PES form related to planning sessions and how to complete them
Roles of the supervisor, employee and 2nd level evaluator in the planning process
            
Guidelines on planning process preparation and goal-setting


Intended Audience:  State employees, supervisors and 2ndlevel evaluators.
            The course interface directs  users to relevant 
    learning paths based on self-identified role.  All learning paths are accessible to all
            users, but offer information targeted by role in the process.
        
Availability: This course is available in LEO.  See below for directions.
PES Evaluation Process

            A partner to the PES Planning Process course, PES Evaluation Process covers the
            specifics of the annual performance evaluation from 
    the perspectives of the employee, supervisor, and 2nd level evaluators.  The function and
            process of the evaluation session is covered, 
    including:
        

Timeline of evaluation process
Evaluation session-relevant sections of the PES form and how to complete them
            
Roles of the supervisor, employee and 2nd level evaluator in the evaluation process
            
Guidelines on rating fairly and accurately
Guidelines on documentation support 
Process of agency and Civil Service review of ratings


Intended audience:  State employees, supervisors and 2ndlevel evaluators.
            The course interface directs  users to relevant 
    learning paths based on self-identified role.  All learning paths are accessible to all
            users, but offer information targeted by role in 
    the process.
        
Availability:  This course is available in LEO.  See below for directions.
PES Form

            This course is a quick reference tool available for anyone who needs to complete
            all or a portion of the PES form.  The course covers 
    each section of the form and what is expected to be included and/or attached to the form.
        

Intended audience:  The course is targeted at state supervisors, who must
            complete the bulk of the PES form.  Other audiences may 
    find the course helpful, however, including HR staff, 2nd level reviewers and employees.
        
Availability:  This course is available in LEO.  See below for directions.
Click this link to get to LEO: https://leo.doa.louisiana.gov/irj/portal

Sign in to LEO with your username and password or create a new account on your first visit.
Click the My Training tab.
On the left is the Navigation panel, which scrolls up and down.
In the Frequently Booked Courses section in the Navigation panel, you will find direct links to each of the three required courses.
Clicking on the title will take you directly to the course.
In the course, click Book this course; then click Start course now.
To find the Forms course, type PES forms in the Find Search Term box and click on Find.
You will see the CPTP PES Forms WBT course option.  Click on that option to get to the course.
In the course, click Book this course; then click Start course now.


Professional Development Training 

CPTP offers professional development courses to all state employees through LEO My
            Training.  We also provide links to helpful software skills training.  Topics include,
            but are not limited to:

Customer service
            
Stress management
            
Dealing with change
            
Writing  and grammar
            
Time management
            
Conflict management
            
Project management
            
Excel 
            
Outlook
            
Word
            





































Email SCSinfo@la.gov


                    Phone: 225-342-8274
Fax: 225-342-8058

                    Toll Free: 866-783-5462

Office and Staff Phone Listing


                    Statewide Email



Administrative Office - 1201 North Third St, Suite
                    3-280, Baton Rouge, Louisiana 70802
                
Mailing Address - P.O. Box 94111, Capitol Station,
                    Baton Rouge, LA 70804-9111
Information and Testing Office - 5825 Florida Boulevard,
                    Baton Rouge, LA 70806, Phone: 225-925-1911
An Equal Opportunity Employer









	Louisiana State Employees' Retirement System (LASERS) - Seminar Registration



































Seminar Registration

											In order to register for seminars, browser scripting must be turned on.
											Please allow scripting for this site before continuing.
										



SeminarDescription

PREP WorkshopBegin preparations well in advance of your retirement. The LASERS staff offers a Pre-Retirement Education Program (PREP) that will give you all the information you need to plan for your future.  Find out about eligibility requirements for retirement, purchase of service credit, the Deferred Retirement Option Plan (DROP), the Initial Benefit Option (IBO), and much more. PREP seminars are approximately four hours in length and usually held between 8:30 a.m. and 12:30 p.m. or 12:30 p.m.- 4:00 p.m. If you would prefer to mail or fax an application, you may use the mail-in PREP application form.

Retiree WorkshopThis workshop is available to retirees only and includes LASERS updates, social security, and investment information.

  



											The Retirement Reference Manual Workshop is offered to Human Resources and Payroll staff and includes LASERS
											updates and details associated with guiding an employee through the retirement process.
										

											Please note the class is offered through Louisiana Employees Online (LEO).
											At course catalog, select Comprehensive Public Training Program, CPTP HR, LASERS.
											The name of course is:  CPTP HR Module 4 LASERS Agency Training. 
										












	2010 Louisiana State Employees' Retirement System - LASERS, All rights reserved.



 

ABOUT SSL CERTIFICATES














  


















Louisiana State Employees Retirement System (LASERS) | Human Resources





























Skip to main content






Toggle navigation





Explore



 

University of Louisiana at Lafayette
Human Resources
Administration and Finance Division






Search form

Search 





 

 





Main menu


About UsContact Information
Human Resources FAQ
Meet Our Staff
Strategic Plan

BenefitsCafeteria Plan
Credit Union
Insurance Plans
Retirement Plans
Tax-Deferred Annuity Plan
Workers' Compensation
Retirees

Employment OpportunitiesClassified Staff Position Announcements
Faculty & Unclassified Staff Position Announcements
Policy on Nondiscrimination

Forms & PoliciesForms
Policies

Training & DevelopmentComputer Based Training (CBT)
Comprehensive Public Training Program (CPTP)
Mandatory Annual Training
Performance Evaluation System - Classified Employees
University Approved Training Courses (UATC)




 















 
 






Benefits


Cafeteria Plan
Credit Union
Insurance Plans
Retirement PlansLouisiana State Employees Retirement System (LASERS)
Teachers' Retirement System of Louisiana (TRSL)
Optional Retirement Program (ORP)

Tax-Deferred Annuity Plan
Workers' Compensation
Retirees



 






You are hereHome » Benefits » Retirement Plans


Louisiana State Employees Retirement System (LASERS)


 The Louisiana State Employees’ Retirement System (LASERS) was established by an Act of the Louisiana Legislature in 1946.  LASERS administers a qualified pension and retirement plan under section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. LASERS is a trust fund created to provide retirement and other benefits for state officers, employees, and their beneficiaries.
	The LASERS Board of Trustees governs your retirement system. The Board is composed of 13 members, nine of whom are elected by the membership. Six of the elected Trustees are chosen by active members of LASERS. Three of the elected Trustees are chosen by retirees. Four ex officio seats are occupied by the Louisiana State Treasurer, the Chair of the Louisiana Senate Committee on Retirement, the Chair of the Louisiana House of Representatives Committee on Retirement, and the Commissioner of Administration. Monthly Board meetings are open to the public, and take place in the fourth floor board room of the Louisiana Retirement Systems Building, located at 8401 United Plaza Boulevard, in Baton Rouge.
The LASERS trust fund is the source of all benefits paid to LASERS members and their beneficiaries. Funding comes from three sources:  employee contributions, employer contribuitions, and earnings from investments.  LASERS manages one-third of its investments portfolio internally, saving millions of dollars per year in professional management fees.
For more information on this plan, visit the following links:

2013 Legislative Bills Impacting LASERS 

LASERS Videos

LASERS Web Site

Publications and Reports for All Members
 












 

 




Employee Benefits


Previous
Next






                    Employee Discount                  

Present your Cajun Card at Piccadilly in the Oil Center to receive a Discount









                    Sportshack Supplement Depot                  

Present your Cajun Card at Sportshack Supplement Depot and Cafe to receive a Discount!
Great Food, Amazing Atmosphere!
 
 









                    Take 5 Lube Express                  

Click for a link to great deals from Take 5!









                    Work it out - Join in the Fun                  

Check out what Bourgeois Hall has to offer!









                    GEAUX CAJUNS!                  

Faculty and Staff are able to purchase up to two non-priority season tickets at half price for any UL Lafayette sporting event.
 
Find out more HERE!









                    UL Federal Credit Union                  

Employees of UL Lafayette are eligible to join the UL Federal Credit Union. Membership benefits include checking, savings, loans, mortgages and other financial services. Join today!
Learn more here 
	 









                    Edith Garland Dupre Library                  

University faculty and staff are extended library privileges, including material check-out and interlibrary loans.
Visit them here!









                    Cajun Card Services                  

Your pass to the Ragin' Cajun® life is your Cajun Card. University employees can receive a Cajun Card which allows them active employee privileges, including Red Dot discounts. It can also be loaded with Cajun Cash and used like a debit card on campus.
Get yours today!
	More information here!
 









                    Faculty & Staff Tuition Exemption                  

Full-Time faculty and staff members and retired faculty and staff (who have served not less than 25 years in the UL System) may register for up to 6 credit hours per semester at reduced tuition. An exemption may also apply to the spouses and dependents of qualifying active full time faculty and staff members and those of retired faculty and staff members (Who have served not less than 25 years in the UL System).
For more information on this please visit this LINK.









                    Bookstore Discount                  

The University Bookstore extends a discount to all University employees and retirees. Each University employee can receive a 20% discount on merchandise purchases!
Find out more here!









                    Wellness Wednesday                  

UL employees can participate in this program sponsored by the College of Nursing and Allied Health Professions to receive various health analysis and screenings at not cost.
Please call 482-6683 for or visit their webpage for more information.









                    Eye Care - Dr. Kirk LeBlanc's Office                  

The UL staff can present their ID card to receive 20% off any pair of glasses. The refraction fee will be waived.

	Dr. LeBlanc participates with UL's  medical insurance.
1000 W Pinhook Rd Ste 303
	Lafayette, La
	 
(p) 337-234-8533.









                    City Club                  

City Club is honored to offer special membership rates to all faculty and employees of the University of Louisiana at Lafayette.  We have special rates for individuals, couples and families. Belonging to the City Club at River Ranch is a way of life that enables Members to relax and find a healthier, engaging and enjoyable lifestyle. We have a strong commitment to improving our Members’ overall health and vitality while offering a fun, family-centric social side through an active calendar of events.  Call today 337-216-6562 or email membership@cityclubrr.com  to set up your tour and get your complimentary week guest pass.
















































 

 
 



 

﻿
































Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Continues to Hold Stake in First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (FFIN) - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for First Financial Bankshares Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor First Financial Bankshares Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Aircastle Limited (NYSE:AYR) Shares Bought by Vanguard Group Inc.
Thrivent Financial For Lutherans Raises Stake in Churchill Downs, Incorporated (NASDAQ:CHDN)
Geode Capital Management LLC Boosts Stake in Union Bankshares Corporation (NASDAQ:UBSH)
Vanguard Group Inc. Acquires 151,826 Shares of Otter Tail Corporation (OTTR)
Versabank (VB) Director Arnold Edward Hillier Buys 1,300 Shares of Stock
Glenview State Bank Trust DEPT. Has $716,000 Stake in Illinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW)
Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Continues to Hold Stake in First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (FFIN)
Sabina Gold & Silver Corp (SBB) Director Donald Bruce Mcleod Acquires 9,500 Shares
NCC Group PLC (NCC) Downgraded by Berenberg Bank to “Sell”
Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Boosts Stake in Bio-Rad Laboratories, Inc. (NYSE:BIO)
Fitbit, Inc. (NYSE:FIT) Upgraded to Hold at Vetr Inc.
BB&T Corporation (BBT) Expected to Earn Q3 2017 Earnings of $0.79 Per Share
Crown Castle International Corporation (NYSE:CCI) to Post Q3 2017 Earnings of $1.16 Per Share, KeyCorp Forecasts
Hill-Rom Holdings Inc (HRC) Shares Bought by Louisiana State Employees Retirement System
Charles River Laboratories International, Inc. (NYSE:CRL) Shares Bought by Louisiana State Employees Retirement System
Nisa Investment Advisors LLC Has $4,065,000 Position in Garmin Ltd. (NASDAQ:GRMN)
Molson Coors Brewing  Company (NYSE:TAP) Shares Sold by Nisa Investment Advisors LLC
Rockwell Collins, Inc. (COL) Shares Bought by Nisa Investment Advisors LLC
Nisa Investment Advisors LLC Maintains Stake in Jack Henry & Associates, Inc. (NASDAQ:JKHY)
LS Investment Advisors LLC Increases Stake in Incyte Corporation (NASDAQ:INCY)




 


Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Continues to Hold Stake in First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (FFIN)

					Posted by Danessa Lincoln on Jul 25th, 2017 // No Comments 




Louisiana State Employees Retirement System maintained its position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (NASDAQ:FFIN) during the second quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 26,900 shares of the bank’s stock at the end of the second quarter. Louisiana State Employees Retirement System’s holdings in First Financial Bankshares were worth $1,189,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
A number of other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also modified their holdings of FFIN. LS Investment Advisors LLC increased its position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares by 20.6% in the first quarter. LS Investment Advisors LLC now owns 3,020 shares of the bank’s stock valued at $121,000 after buying an additional 516 shares in the last quarter.  Victory Capital Management Inc. increased its position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares by 26.8% in the first quarter. Victory Capital Management Inc. now owns 3,520 shares of the bank’s stock valued at $141,000 after buying an additional 743 shares in the last quarter.  Bank of Montreal Can increased its position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares by 9.0% in the first quarter. Bank of Montreal Can now owns 5,151 shares of the bank’s stock valued at $207,000 after buying an additional 426 shares in the last quarter.  OppenheimerFunds Inc. acquired a new position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares during the first quarter valued at approximately $270,000.  Finally, Dynamic Technology Lab Private Ltd acquired a new position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares during the first quarter valued at approximately $272,000. 49.89% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors. 


 Get First Financial Bankshares Inc. alerts:



Shares of First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (FFIN) opened at 43.30 on Tuesday. The stock’s 50 day moving average price is $42.34 and its 200-day moving average price is $41.52. The company has a market capitalization of $2.86 billion, a PE ratio of 26.70 and a beta of 1.34. First Financial Bankshares, Inc. has a 52-week low of $33.29 and a 52-week high of $46.70. 




First Financial Bankshares (NASDAQ:FFIN) last released its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, July 20th. The bank reported $0.43 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $0.42 by $0.01. The business had revenue of $82.25 million during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $87.11 million. First Financial Bankshares had a return on equity of 12.41% and a net margin of 33.03%. The firm’s revenue for the quarter was up 5.5% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period last year, the firm posted $0.41 EPS.  On average, analysts expect that  First Financial Bankshares, Inc. will post $1.69 earnings per share for the current year. 
The company also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Monday, July 3rd. Investors of record on Friday, June 16th were issued a dividend of $0.19 per share. This is a boost from First Financial Bankshares’s previous quarterly dividend of $0.18. This represents a $0.76 annualized dividend and a yield of 1.76%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend  was Wednesday, June 14th. First Financial Bankshares’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is presently 46.91%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: This article was first  posted by Markets Daily and is owned by of Markets Daily. If you are accessing this article on another publication, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of U.S. and international trademark and copyright laws. The correct version of this article can be viewed at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/25/louisiana-state-employees-retirement-system-continues-to-hold-stake-in-first-financial-bankshares-inc-ffin.html. 
FFIN has been the topic of a number of research reports. Stephens  restated a “hold” rating on shares of First Financial Bankshares in a research report on Monday, April 24th. Piper Jaffray Companies  restated a “hold” rating and set a $41.00 price objective on shares of First Financial Bankshares in a research report on Friday. Zacks Investment Research upgraded First Financial Bankshares from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $46.00 price objective on the stock in a research report on Friday, June 9th. BidaskClub cut First Financial Bankshares from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Wednesday, July 19th. Finally, Keefe, Bruyette & Woods upgraded First Financial Bankshares from an “underperform” rating to a “market perform” rating and boosted their price objective for the company from $37.00 to $38.00 in a research report on Friday, April 21st. One analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, four have given a hold rating and one  has assigned  a buy rating to the stock. The company  has an average rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $42.00.
In related news, Director David L. Copeland sold 684 shares of First Financial Bankshares stock in a transaction that occurred on Wednesday, May 31st. The stock was sold at an average price of $38.00, for a total transaction of $25,992.00. Following the completion of the sale, the director now directly owns 33,379 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $1,268,402. The transaction was disclosed in a legal filing with the SEC, which is accessible through the SEC website. Also, Director Ronald N. Giddiens sold 1,000 shares of First Financial Bankshares stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, June 9th. The stock was sold at an average price of $41.00, for a total value of $41,000.00. Following the sale, the director now directly owns 13,816 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $566,456. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Over the last three months, insiders have purchased 3,230 shares of company stock valued at $127,549. 5.40% of the stock is currently owned by insiders. 
First Financial Bankshares Company Profile
First Financial Bankshares, Inc is a financial holding company. The Company, through its subsidiaries, conducts commercial banking business. As of December 31, 2016, the Company’s subsidiaries included First Financial Bank, National Association, Abilene, Texas; First Technology Services, Inc, Abilene, Texas; First Financial Trust & Asset Management Company, National Association, Abilene, Texas; First Financial Investments, Inc, Abilene, Texas, and First Financial Insurance Agency, Inc, Abilene, Texas.







Receive News & Ratings for First Financial Bankshares Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for First Financial Bankshares Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website


























































﻿
































Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Continues to Hold Stake in First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (FFIN) - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for First Financial Bankshares Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor First Financial Bankshares Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Aircastle Limited (NYSE:AYR) Shares Bought by Vanguard Group Inc.
Thrivent Financial For Lutherans Raises Stake in Churchill Downs, Incorporated (NASDAQ:CHDN)
Geode Capital Management LLC Boosts Stake in Union Bankshares Corporation (NASDAQ:UBSH)
Vanguard Group Inc. Acquires 151,826 Shares of Otter Tail Corporation (OTTR)
Versabank (VB) Director Arnold Edward Hillier Buys 1,300 Shares of Stock
Glenview State Bank Trust DEPT. Has $716,000 Stake in Illinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW)
Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Continues to Hold Stake in First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (FFIN)
Sabina Gold & Silver Corp (SBB) Director Donald Bruce Mcleod Acquires 9,500 Shares
NCC Group PLC (NCC) Downgraded by Berenberg Bank to “Sell”
Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Boosts Stake in Bio-Rad Laboratories, Inc. (NYSE:BIO)
Fitbit, Inc. (NYSE:FIT) Upgraded to Hold at Vetr Inc.
BB&T Corporation (BBT) Expected to Earn Q3 2017 Earnings of $0.79 Per Share
Crown Castle International Corporation (NYSE:CCI) to Post Q3 2017 Earnings of $1.16 Per Share, KeyCorp Forecasts
Hill-Rom Holdings Inc (HRC) Shares Bought by Louisiana State Employees Retirement System
Charles River Laboratories International, Inc. (NYSE:CRL) Shares Bought by Louisiana State Employees Retirement System
Nisa Investment Advisors LLC Has $4,065,000 Position in Garmin Ltd. (NASDAQ:GRMN)
Molson Coors Brewing  Company (NYSE:TAP) Shares Sold by Nisa Investment Advisors LLC
Rockwell Collins, Inc. (COL) Shares Bought by Nisa Investment Advisors LLC
Nisa Investment Advisors LLC Maintains Stake in Jack Henry & Associates, Inc. (NASDAQ:JKHY)
LS Investment Advisors LLC Increases Stake in Incyte Corporation (NASDAQ:INCY)




 


Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Continues to Hold Stake in First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (FFIN)

					Posted by Danessa Lincoln on Jul 25th, 2017 // No Comments 




Louisiana State Employees Retirement System maintained its position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (NASDAQ:FFIN) during the second quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 26,900 shares of the bank’s stock at the end of the second quarter. Louisiana State Employees Retirement System’s holdings in First Financial Bankshares were worth $1,189,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
A number of other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also modified their holdings of FFIN. LS Investment Advisors LLC increased its position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares by 20.6% in the first quarter. LS Investment Advisors LLC now owns 3,020 shares of the bank’s stock valued at $121,000 after buying an additional 516 shares in the last quarter.  Victory Capital Management Inc. increased its position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares by 26.8% in the first quarter. Victory Capital Management Inc. now owns 3,520 shares of the bank’s stock valued at $141,000 after buying an additional 743 shares in the last quarter.  Bank of Montreal Can increased its position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares by 9.0% in the first quarter. Bank of Montreal Can now owns 5,151 shares of the bank’s stock valued at $207,000 after buying an additional 426 shares in the last quarter.  OppenheimerFunds Inc. acquired a new position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares during the first quarter valued at approximately $270,000.  Finally, Dynamic Technology Lab Private Ltd acquired a new position in shares of  First Financial Bankshares during the first quarter valued at approximately $272,000. 49.89% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors. 


 Get First Financial Bankshares Inc. alerts:



Shares of First Financial Bankshares, Inc. (FFIN) opened at 43.30 on Tuesday. The stock’s 50 day moving average price is $42.34 and its 200-day moving average price is $41.52. The company has a market capitalization of $2.86 billion, a PE ratio of 26.70 and a beta of 1.34. First Financial Bankshares, Inc. has a 52-week low of $33.29 and a 52-week high of $46.70. 




First Financial Bankshares (NASDAQ:FFIN) last released its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, July 20th. The bank reported $0.43 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $0.42 by $0.01. The business had revenue of $82.25 million during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $87.11 million. First Financial Bankshares had a return on equity of 12.41% and a net margin of 33.03%. The firm’s revenue for the quarter was up 5.5% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period last year, the firm posted $0.41 EPS.  On average, analysts expect that  First Financial Bankshares, Inc. will post $1.69 earnings per share for the current year. 
The company also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Monday, July 3rd. Investors of record on Friday, June 16th were issued a dividend of $0.19 per share. This is a boost from First Financial Bankshares’s previous quarterly dividend of $0.18. This represents a $0.76 annualized dividend and a yield of 1.76%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend  was Wednesday, June 14th. First Financial Bankshares’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is presently 46.91%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: This article was first  posted by Markets Daily and is owned by of Markets Daily. If you are accessing this article on another publication, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of U.S. and international trademark and copyright laws. The correct version of this article can be viewed at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/25/louisiana-state-employees-retirement-system-continues-to-hold-stake-in-first-financial-bankshares-inc-ffin.html. 
FFIN has been the topic of a number of research reports. Stephens  restated a “hold” rating on shares of First Financial Bankshares in a research report on Monday, April 24th. Piper Jaffray Companies  restated a “hold” rating and set a $41.00 price objective on shares of First Financial Bankshares in a research report on Friday. Zacks Investment Research upgraded First Financial Bankshares from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $46.00 price objective on the stock in a research report on Friday, June 9th. BidaskClub cut First Financial Bankshares from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Wednesday, July 19th. Finally, Keefe, Bruyette & Woods upgraded First Financial Bankshares from an “underperform” rating to a “market perform” rating and boosted their price objective for the company from $37.00 to $38.00 in a research report on Friday, April 21st. One analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, four have given a hold rating and one  has assigned  a buy rating to the stock. The company  has an average rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $42.00.
In related news, Director David L. Copeland sold 684 shares of First Financial Bankshares stock in a transaction that occurred on Wednesday, May 31st. The stock was sold at an average price of $38.00, for a total transaction of $25,992.00. Following the completion of the sale, the director now directly owns 33,379 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $1,268,402. The transaction was disclosed in a legal filing with the SEC, which is accessible through the SEC website. Also, Director Ronald N. Giddiens sold 1,000 shares of First Financial Bankshares stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, June 9th. The stock was sold at an average price of $41.00, for a total value of $41,000.00. Following the sale, the director now directly owns 13,816 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $566,456. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Over the last three months, insiders have purchased 3,230 shares of company stock valued at $127,549. 5.40% of the stock is currently owned by insiders. 
First Financial Bankshares Company Profile
First Financial Bankshares, Inc is a financial holding company. The Company, through its subsidiaries, conducts commercial banking business. As of December 31, 2016, the Company’s subsidiaries included First Financial Bank, National Association, Abilene, Texas; First Technology Services, Inc, Abilene, Texas; First Financial Trust & Asset Management Company, National Association, Abilene, Texas; First Financial Investments, Inc, Abilene, Texas, and First Financial Insurance Agency, Inc, Abilene, Texas.







Receive News & Ratings for First Financial Bankshares Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for First Financial Bankshares Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website




























































Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Buys 1400 Shares of Fortinet, Inc. (FTNT)






















Company Info 
 
Terms of Use 
Sitemap 
































You are here:
Main

»

					Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Buys 1400 Shares of Fortinet, Inc. (FTNT)				








Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Buys 1400 Shares of Fortinet, Inc. (FTNT) 
 


by
		

				Craig Cunningham			 - 
		

at 
July 23, 2017  





Share















Capstone Asset Management Co. now owns 13,392 shares of the software maker's stock valued at $514,000 after buying an additional 530 shares in the last quarter. As of the end of the quarter Proficio Capital Partners LLC had acquired a total of 95 shares growing its stake by 633.3%. Marshall Wace North America L.P. bought a new position in shares of Fortinet during the first quarter worth approximately $77,398,000. Closely-held shares are those owned by insiders, major shareholders and employees, while restricted stock refers to insider shares that can not be traded because of a temporary restriction such as the lock-up period after an initial public offering. Caisse DE Depot ET Placement DU Quebec increased its position in Fortinet by 1.2% in the first quarter. Ropes Wealth Advisors LLC now owns 2,755 shares of the software maker's stock worth $106,000 after buying an additional 275 shares during the period. Perhaps, that suggests something about why 73.07% of the outstanding share supply is held by institutional investors.
Fortinet, Inc. was upgraded to "positive" by analysts at OTR Global. (NASDAQ:FTNT) was up +0.60% during the last trading session, with a day high of 40.55. A total volume of 0.9 million shares were traded versus to average volume of 1.71 million shares.Fortinet, Inc. has a 50 day moving average of 38.59 and a 200 day moving average of 37.28. The stock has a market cap of $7.11 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 176.00 and a beta of 1.02. Looking at the stock's movement on the chart, Fortinet, Inc. recorded a 52-week high of $41.33. Fortinet Inc (NASDAQ:FTNT) has risen 20.17% since July 20, 2016 and is uptrending. The software maker reported $0.07 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, beating analysts' consensus estimates of $0.02 by $0.05. The business had revenue of $340.60 million during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $334.44 million. The company generated a return on equity (ROE) of 4.90%. FTNT generated revenue of $383.83 Million in the same quarter, one year ago. During the same quarter in the previous year, the firm earned $0.12 earnings per share. After having $0.07 EPS previously, Fortinet Inc's analysts see 14.29 % EPS growth.04/21/2017 - Fortinet, Inc. had its "buy" rating reiterated by analysts at Dougherty & Co.COPYRIGHT VIOLATION WARNING: This piece of content was published by Week Herald and is owned by of Week Herald. The original version of this piece can be read at https://transcriptdaily.com/2017/07/22/juncture-wealth-strategies-llc-increases-stake-in-fortinet-inc-nasdaqftnt.html.

British Open 2017 Leaderboard: Latest Scores and Standings from Saturday
					That alone should concern his fellow competitors, seeing as Spieth - victor of the Masters and U.S. McIlroy won that tournament. "When I was at 4-over I was definitely thinking cut-line".
				A number of research firms have recently commented on FTNT. Royal Bank Of Canada raised their target price on Fortinet from $35.00 to $41.00 and gave the company an "outperform" rating in a research report on Friday, April 28th. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Fortinet from a "hold" rating to a "buy" rating and set a $44.00 price target for the company in a research note on Wednesday, May 3rd. They noted that the move was a valuation call.Fortinet, Inc. (NASDAQ:FTNT) has earned a consensus recommendation of "Buy" from the thirty-one analysts that are covering the firm, Marketbeat Ratings reports. October 12 investment analysts at Barclays left the company rating at "Buy" but lowered the price target from $42.00 to $36.00. They presently have a $45.00 target price on the software maker's stock. Also, Director Ming Hsieh sold 4,743 shares of Fortinet stock in a transaction on Thursday, June 8th. Monitoring stock price activity relative to moving averages and the highs and lows for the past year might help with future stock price value assessment. Following the sale, the insider now owns 978 shares in the company, valued at $39,833.94. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through this link.In related news, VP John Whittle sold 11,057 shares of Fortinet stock in a transaction on Tuesday, May 2nd. The stock was sold at an average price of $39.45, for a total transaction of $436,198.65.The company is so far trading unchanged from yesterday's close of $40.47. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Over the last 90 days, insiders have sold 29,857 shares of company stock worth $1,178,454. The Director now owns $0 of the stock as recorded in a recent Form 4 SEC filing. Susquehanna Bancshares Inc began coverage on Fortinet in a research note on Wednesday, June 7th. The Business's network security solution consists of FortiGate physical, software and cloud solutions, which are deployable in the business environments of enterprises, service providers and small and medium-sized businesses, as well as government organizations.

 







Share













Related Articles









23 July 2017




New York Knicks: Kyrie Irving coming can show there is still hope
				Irving is under contract fortwo more years, and the Cavs could decide to hold onto him in hopes of repairing the relationship. He is still under team control for two years, and he is immediately the best player and leader of the team.			








23 July 2017




Ford Seeks to Avoid Recalling 2.5 Million Vehicles for Airbag Issues
				It turns out Ford manufactured about 2.5 million vehicles with airbag inflators that Takata declared defective just last week. For one thing, there have been zero reported cases of the inflators in question rupturing in the real world, or in testing.			






Rory McIlroy gains early momentum on day two of the Open
				He wasn't robotic or godlike; it felt as if you were watching an affable mortal do unbelievable things. I had to find a couple of little key thoughts, and I feel like I have. "I was nervous going out".			










23 July 2017




Ashok Malik to be Kovind's press secretary
				The Appointments Committee of the Cabinet approved his appointment on Friday for a period of two years. Kothari was appointed as PESB chief.			








23 July 2017




German auto  makers under European Union  cartel investigation
				And on Friday, Audi said it would retrofit 850,000 diesel cars to improve their emissions in "real driving conditions".  The company firmly believes that the program will counteract the bans on vehicles that run on diesel engines.			






Neymar '90%' to leave Barcelona
				Neymar , meanwhile, will receive an up-front fee of €40m when he completes his world record €222m transfer . Catalunya Radio believed the move is "95%", based on "an authorized source of the French club".			










23 July 2017




McIlroy rebounds after poor start
				That left the South African alongside McIlroy, three off the pace. "There's a big difference between five over par and six over". He had steadied the slide by that stage though, and managed to birdie the only two par 5s on the course, the 15th and 17th hole.			






Gilead Sciences, Inc. (GILD) Upgraded to "Strong-Buy" at Vetr Inc
				In related news, Director John Francis Cogan sold 9,943 shares of the stock in a transaction that occurred on Tuesday, May 9th. Berkshire Asset Management LLC PA acquired a new position in Gilead Sciences during the first quarter worth about $270,000.			








23 July 2017




Man City fullback Walker: We must better Spurs
				Kyle Walker has admitted his record-breaking move from Tottenham to Manchester City was motivated by the desire to win more silverware.			










23 July 2017




Trump takes aim at Russian meddling probe with volley of tweets
				Many deposed kings have gone off to the chopping block, and would have avoided that if they had been able to pardon themselves. Moscow has denied interference in the USA election, and President Trump has said his campaign did not collude.			






Drilling Down Into Smart Sand Inc. (SND)
				Finally, Sprott Inc. acquired a new stake in shares of Smart Sand during the first quarter valued at approximately $10,562,000. The company reported $0.02 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, missing the Zacks' consensus estimate of $0.05 by $0.03.			








23 July 2017




The Open: Jordan Spieth three clear as Branden Grace fires landmark 62
				This is not worthy of this.' When Matt came over and said that, I had already started to kind of appreciate that. The bad news for the chasing pack is that Spieth has converted five of his last 36-hole leads into victories.			














		Latest news
	




			Chelsea resume interest in Inter star with refreshed €23m bid		

		Candreva is said to be in line for a big bump on his £85,000-a-week wages if he heads for west London. They are now moving to the capital full-time and Conte says that was another factor in staying on.	


			'This was definitely the round that got me back into the Championship'		

		I'm very focused on what I'm doing right now. "It was tricky. 35-miles-an-hour wind in a different direction to yesterday". McIlroy is hoping for some bad weather on Sunday , which is in the forecast, to try and bring Spieth down the leaderboard.	


			Watch Team Trump deny any collusion with the Russians		

		Kushner, who is married to Trump's daughter Ivanka Trump, also attended the June 2016 meeting with the Russian lawyer, Natalia Veselnitskaya.	


			Branden Grace shoots record-low 62 at British Open		

		Of the first 61 players, 34 broke par , including the 62 by Brendan Steele that set a record for major championship play. And finally, there Ian Poulter who goes into the weekend chasing but who's certainly entertaining dreams of his own .	


			There's no place like Indy for Kyle Busch		

		Need More winners against the spread? One was of the Braves-Cubs game from his seat at SunTrust Park. This is something that Trampas Demers will no doubt remind his pals of from like now until eternity.	


			The Open: Rory McIlroy delighted with second-day performance		

		And when his putter is working - it really hasn't been this year - he is regarded as a favorite at just about any tournament. Brooks Koepka is another two shots back. "I mishit the shot, which is probably why it looked so gross", Spieth said.	


			Spieth leads Open by two as Birkdale bares teeth		

		Except for a few hours early in the round when the wind was coming in from the west off the sea, it was a tee shot into the wind. With the weather expected to improve as the day progressed it could play into the hands of an out-of-form Rory McIlroy .	


			Lipstick Under My Burkha Movie Preview		

		A burkha-clad college girl struggles with issues of cultural identity and her aspirations to be a pop singer. They are suffocated on all sides by society, relatives, and parents and expected to conform to set rules.	


			Kislyak Ends Term As Russia's Ambassador To Washington		

		Clinton spokesman Nick Merrill did not immediately respond to a request for comment Saturday. His office has also denied he ever spoke with Kislyak about campaign interference.	


			Spieth, Kuchar separate themselves from field		

		Spieth will play in Saturday's final pairing alongside Kuchar, a teammate and fellow "pod" member during the past two Ryder Cups.  Injury-plagued Day clutched his wrist on several occasions during the first round, but played down any serious distress.	


			Pablo Sandoval returns to Giants with minor league contract		

		Giants manager Bruce Bochy said Sandoval will have to prove himself in the minor leagues, both in the field and at the plate.?   Sandoval played in 126 games for Boston in 2015 and struggled with a.245 average and 10 home runs.	


			Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV (NYSE:FCAU) Upgraded by BidaskClub to Hold		

		As of the end of the quarter Exane Derivatives had acquired a total of 599,918 shares growing its stake by 14,294.0%. The fund owned 1,250,940 shares of the company's stock after buying an additional 410,182 shares during the period.	


			Express Scripts Holding Company (ESRX) Shares Bought by Abbrea Capital LLC		

		The stock of Express Scripts Holding Company (NASDAQ:ESRX) has "Underperform" rating given on Thursday, June 16 by Bernstein.  The Columbia Partners Llc Investment Management holds 11,264 shares with $774,000 value, down from 20,938 last quarter.	


			Rory McIlroy rues missed opportunities on tough Day Three at The Open		

		He has become accustomed to sleeping on the lead at a major championship and has become more comfortable in doing so. Kuchar's second straight birdie on the third hole moved him to 6 under for the tournament, tied with Jordan Spieth .	


			Diego Costa was told he could leave in January, says Antonio Conte		

		However, on Saturday, Zidane said: "He is a very good player and is wanted by many clubs". Lukaku cost a lot of money, the same with [Arsenal striker Alexandre] Lacazette.	







		Other news
	


Prince William and Kate tried, but couldn't snatch GoT spoilers		


Clean up begins after storms savage New Zealand's South Island		


Young rowers rescued from Atlantic after boat capsizes		


McIlroy wastes fast start, rues 'opportunity lost' at Open		


Chelsea approach Inter as they look to swoop for £23m star		


Rory McIlroy Trails Clubhouse Leader Kuchar By Three Shots		


Shares in CGI Group, Inc. (GIB) Acquired by Mn Services Vermogensbeheer BV		


Jared Leto calls Chester Bennington 'absolute legend' in moving note		


Srinagar shutdown: Separatists to march towards United Nations  office against civilian killings		


Matches to Make After UFC on Fox 25		


Syria, Russia Announce Truce For Area Near Damascus		


Spicer clears the air about resignation; there were 'too many cooks'		


'Great potential' - Delighted Conte hails Chelsea forward after win over Arsenal		


OJ Simpson will be welcome at the Pro Football Hall of Fame		


Is Jordan Spieth a lock to win the claret jug Sunday?		


 




 







Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Increases Stake in Fortinet, Inc. (NASDAQ:FTNT)

































  Headlines
                

SC rejects plea to probe Pandit deaths 
Sugar-sweetened drinks and high-protein meal combination linked to fat storage 
Pggm Investments Sold A Little More Eli Lilly and Company (LLY) Stock 
Featured Stock Overview: SeaWorld Entertainment, Inc. (SEAS) 
Gardiner pot dispensary offers free marijuana for litter gatherers 
Manhunt for armed suspect in national forest 
Study Examines Consequences of Growing Nonmedical Vaccine Exceptions 


























News
Finance Life&Culture Technology Research Sports World Media Medical USA 




Finance
Life&Culture
Technology
Research
Sports
World Media
Medical
USA


 


Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Increases Stake in Fortinet, Inc. (NASDAQ:FTNT)
Amos Gonzales
July 23, 2017



Share












A 21 analysts rate it as either a buy or a strong buy, while 0 believe that investors should either steer clear of (NASDAQ:FTNT) or, if they already own its stock, sell it. BlackRock Inc. increased its position in shares of Fortinet by 7,159.6% in the first quarter. Harel Insurance Investments & Financial Services Ltd. now owns 3,060 shares of the software maker's stock worth $116,000 after buying an additional 540 shares in the last quarter. The value of the company's investment in Fortinet, Inc. increased from $796,000 to $977,000 a change of 22.7% quarter to quarter. Inc. now owns 3,275 shares of the software maker's stock worth $126,000 after buying an additional 2,750 shares in the last quarter. The stock increased 1.09% or $0.18 on July 19, reaching $16.73. Finally, Renaissance Technologies LLC increased its position in shares of Fortinet by 45.0% in the first quarter. NEXT Financial Group Inc now owns 4,349 shares of the software maker's stock valued at $163,000 after buying an additional 4,324 shares during the period. LS Investment Advisors LLC now owns 13,415 shares of the software maker's stock valued at $514,000 after buying an additional 96 shares during the period. Migdal Insurance & Financial Holdings Ltd. acquired a new stake in shares of Fortinet during the fourth quarter valued at approximately $121,000. Hedge funds and other institutional investors own 72.77% of the company's stock.
Shares of Fortinet, Inc. (NASDAQ FTNT) opened at 40.47 on Wednesday.Fortinet Inc. (FTNT) stock price rose 18.58 percent over the past one year, while increased 27.67 percent during the past 6 months.FTNT has been trading in a bearish trend, based on the relative levels of its 50-day and 200-day simple moving averages. Fortinet, Inc. (FTNT) now trades with a market capitalization of $7.21 Billion.Fortinet (NASDAQ:FTNT) last released its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, April 27th. After $0.76 actual earnings per share reported by DISH Network Corp for the previous quarter, Wall Street now forecasts -1.32% negative EPS growth. The company had revenue of $340.60 million during the quarter, compared to analysts' expectations of $334.44 million. The Return on Equity ratio of Fortinet Inc. Fortinet's revenue was up 19.7% compared to the same quarter past year. For the current year, analysts are predicting earnings of $0.03 per share according to First Call.

Spieth to take three-shot lead into British Open final round
					A victory in The Open Championship would allow him to claim three of the four major championships before the age of 24. Kuchar does not have a glowing major championship resume, but he's one of the most consistent players on the PGA Tour .
				In terms of Fortinet, Inc. (FTNT) has made a move of +9.69% over the past month, which has come on weak relative transaction volume. If you are reading this piece on another site, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of United States & global trademark and copyright laws. The legal version of this article can be viewed at https://www.thecerbatgem.com/2017/07/21/fortinet-inc-ftnt-shares-bought-by-new-england-research-management-inc-updated.html. Barclays Capital maintained the shares of DISH in report on Thursday, February 23 with "Equal Weight" rating. Monness Crespi & Hardt started coverage on shares of Fortinet in a research report on Wednesday, June 14th. On Wednesday, October 12 the stock rating was maintained by RBC Capital Markets with "Sector Perform". The stock of Fortinet Inc (NASDAQ:FTNT) has "Buy" rating given on Thursday, July 23 by Needham.06/29/2017 - Northland Securities began new coverage on Fortinet, Inc. giving the company a " rating. Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. reiterated an "outperform" rating and issued a $45.00 target price on shares of Fortinet in a research note on Thursday, June 22nd. Robert W. Baird reissued a "buy" rating on shares of Fortinet in a research report on Friday, April 28th. Nine equities research analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating, twenty have issued a buy rating and one has issued a strong buy rating to the stock. The company has an average rating of "Buy" and a consensus price target of $41.52. The shares were sold at an average price of $39.29, for a total value of $186,352.47. The sale was disclosed in a document filed with the SEC, which is available at this hyperlink.In other news, insider Keith Jensen sold 624 shares of the company's stock in a transaction that occurred on Wednesday, May 17th. The stock was sold at an average price of $39.45, for a total value of $436,198.65. Following the completion of the transaction, the director now directly owns 67,949 shares of the company's stock, valued at $2,652,728.96. About 375,710 shares traded.Fortinet, Inc. (FTNT) is an interesting player in the Technology space, with a focus on Application Software. As a foundation of the Fortinet Security Fabric, the FortiGate Enterprise Firewall is the only solution that delivers the scale, automation, and performance needed to protect from the edge to the datacenter and from IoT to the Cloud.


 




Other reports by BadHub 









23 July 2017




Ford tries to worm its way out of the latest Takata recall









23 July 2017




UFC on Fox 25: Weidman vs. Gastelum Results









23 July 2017




Giants sign Sandoval to minor league deal











23 July 2017




New York Knicks: Kyrie Irving coming can show there is still hope









23 July 2017




'Arrow' Season 6 Casts Michael Emerson In Mystery Role, Other Villains Confirmed









23 July 2017




USA  defends no longer arming Syrian rebels









Sigourney Weaver Tries to Destroy New York in Ominous New Defenders Trailer









23 July 2017




The Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV (NYSE:FCAU) Short Interest Update







Spicer resigns from White House, Scaramucci takes podium











23 July 2017




McIlroy charges, then fades in Round 3 at The Open









23 July 2017




British Open Leaderboard: Matt Kuchar Holds On as Rory McIlroy Surges







Antonio Conte praises Chelsea's Michy Batshuayi after double in Arsenal win









Recent News Articles


 
Gov. Chris Christie signs bill raising NJ smoking age to 21




 
The Open 2017: Jordan Spieth has learned from 2016 Masters collapse




 
Man City set to sign Benjamin Mendy for €50 from AS Monaco




Discuss This Article








 MOST POPULAR BadHub




Young heart transplant patient dies, family says



Weather becomes a factor at British Open



Stern words from caddie kickstart Rory's round



Spieth, Kuchar separate themselves from field



Russian diplomat Sergey Kislyak departs United States  as ambassadorship ends



Charlie Gard hospital calls in police over death threats to staff



German car-maker Audi offers diesel engine upgrade



Complete shutdown observed in Occupied Kashmir



Rory McIlroy Trails Clubhouse Leader Kuchar By Three Shots


Neymar has agreed to terms with Paris-Saint Germain







FOLLOW OUR NEWSPAPER











LATES NEWS BadHub



 
SC rejects plea to probe Pandit deaths


Sugar-sweetened drinks and high-protein meal combination linked to fat storage


Pggm Investments Sold A Little More Eli Lilly and Company (LLY) Stock


Featured Stock Overview: SeaWorld Entertainment, Inc. (SEAS)


Gardiner pot dispensary offers free marijuana for litter gatherers


Manhunt for armed suspect in national forest


Study Examines Consequences of Growing Nonmedical Vaccine Exceptions


Government set to ban leaseholds on new-builds in England


Study finds CTE in 99 percent of ex-NFL players


Ice cream sales soar as price inflation stalls







OTHER NEWS


Technology
Life&Culture
Finance









Primarily this will be to solve a number of "complications with a clie...









The game's main mode, Survival, tasks up to six players with holding o...









News headlines  about Nokia Corporation  (NYSE: NOK ) have trended som...









Engeln starts off by describing a new Public Event where players defen...









All phones feature a SD card for expandable storage however.   The res...












However,  her  request fell on deaf ears, with  Nymeria  simply turnin...









War has begun between  Cersei  and Daenerys, with  Stormborn  seeing  ...









Sorry  for anybody who feels disappointed or betrayed", before flashin...









Kim Kardashian  is the queen of naked selfies, and it's somewhat under...









But while Serkis' version of the character likely won't transform that...












The Ahmedpur Sharqia oil tanker accident that occurred a day before Ei...









Read the executive order . Please be respectful of the opinions of oth...









The trailer of  Baadshaho , which has an ensemble cast of  Ajay Devgn ...









Earnings up, Revenue down:  Overall, AT&T posted per-share earnings 79...









Tdam Usa Inc decreased its stake in  Seagate Technology Plc  ( STX ) b...
























© 2017 badhub.net, BadHub




Research
Technology
Life&Culture
Finance


USA
Medical
World Media
Sports





Edition

About Team

Contact Info








﻿




























Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Purchases 1,200 Shares of Donaldson Company, Inc. (NYSE:DCI) - StockNewsTimes














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings & News for Donaldson Company Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Donaldson Company Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @StockNewTimes









Recent Posts

IDEX Corporation (IEX) Issues  Earnings Results
Dolby Laboratories (NYSE:DLB) Updates Q4 Earnings Guidance
Express Scripts Holding Company (NASDAQ:ESRX) Posts Quarterly  Earnings Results, Beats Estimates By $0.02 EPS
Southwest Bancorp, Inc. (NASDAQ:OKSB) Announces  Earnings Results, Hits Estimates
First Community Corporation (NASDAQ:FCCO) Stock Rating Lowered by Zacks Investment Research
Glu Mobile Inc. (GLUU) Upgraded to “Hold” at Zacks Investment Research
Aqua America (NYSE:WTR) Receiving Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage, Report Finds
Park Hotels & Resorts (PK) Receiving Somewhat Positive News Coverage, Analysis Finds
Lazard (NYSE:LAZ) Receives Media Impact Score of 0.46
Somewhat Positive Media Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Impact Brixmor Property Group (BRX) Stock Price
Eli Lilly and Company (NYSE:LLY) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $5.59 Billion
Carlisle Companies Incorporated (NYSE:CSL) Issues  Earnings Results, Misses Estimates By $0.02 EPS
NEXEO SOLUTIONS (NXEO) Major Shareholder Sells $84,300.00 in Stock
Intuitive Surgical, Inc. (ISRG) SVP Sells $1,142,140.40 in Stock
Traders Buy Ford Motor Company (F) on Weakness
Reviewing Inter Parfums (IPAR) & Elizabeth Arden (NASDAQ:RDEN)
Contrasting Deckers Outdoor Corporation (DECK) and Caleres (NYSE:CAL)
Reviewing Cable One (CABO) and Hemisphere Media Group (HMTV)
Analyzing Infinity Property and Casualty Corporation (IPCC) & Safety Insurance Group (SAFT)
Plantronics, Inc. (NYSE:PLT) Given Average Rating of “Buy” by Analysts



 


Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Purchases 1,200 Shares of Donaldson Company, Inc. (NYSE:DCI)

					Posted by Stan Pace on Jul 20th, 2017 // No Comments 



Louisiana State Employees Retirement System boosted its position in  Donaldson Company, Inc. (NYSE:DCI) by 3.6% during the second quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The firm owned 34,500 shares of the industrial products company’s stock after buying an additional 1,200 shares during the period. Louisiana State Employees Retirement System’s holdings in Donaldson were worth $1,571,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
A number of other institutional investors have also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Mosaic Family Wealth LLC increased its position in  Donaldson by 3.0% in the first quarter. Mosaic Family Wealth LLC now owns 4,215 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $192,000 after buying an additional 123 shares during the period.  First Merchants Corp increased its position in  Donaldson by 0.4% in the first quarter. First Merchants Corp now owns 33,321 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $1,517,000 after buying an additional 125 shares during the period.  Liberty Mutual Group Asset Management Inc. increased its position in  Donaldson by 0.3% in the first quarter. Liberty Mutual Group Asset Management Inc. now owns 59,312 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $2,700,000 after buying an additional 190 shares during the period.  Creative Planning increased its position in  Donaldson by 0.3% in the second quarter. Creative Planning now owns 75,924 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $3,458,000 after buying an additional 193 shares during the period.  Finally, Dynamic Advisors Solutions LLC increased its position in  Donaldson by 1.4% in the second quarter. Dynamic Advisors Solutions LLC now owns 14,205 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $647,000 after buying an additional 200 shares during the period. 78.77% of the stock is owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 


 Get Donaldson Company Inc. alerts:



Shares of Donaldson Company, Inc. (DCI) traded down 0.032% during midday trading on Thursday, hitting $46.975. The stock had a trading volume of 15,874 shares. Donaldson Company, Inc. has a 52 week low of $34.95 and a 52 week high of $48.91. The firm has a market cap of $6.16 billion, a P/E ratio of 27.961 and a beta of 1.21. The company’s 50 day moving average is $46.05 and its 200 day moving average is $44.81. 




Donaldson (NYSE:DCI) last announced its earnings results on Thursday, June 1st. The industrial products company reported $0.45 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, beating the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $0.44 by $0.01. The company had revenue of $608.20 million for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $580.44 million. Donaldson had a return on equity of 28.12% and a net margin of 9.72%. Donaldson’s quarterly revenue was up 6.5% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the previous year, the firm earned $0.43 earnings per share.  On average, equities analysts predict that  Donaldson Company, Inc. will post ($0.38) earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
The business also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Wednesday, June 28th. Investors of record on Monday, June 12th were given a dividend of $0.175 per share. The ex-dividend date of this dividend  was Thursday, June 8th. This represents a $0.70 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 1.49%. Donaldson’s payout ratio is 41.92%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: “Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Purchases 1,200 Shares of Donaldson Company, Inc. (NYSE:DCI)” was  reported by StockNewsTimes and is owned by of StockNewsTimes. If you are viewing this story on another publication, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of U.S. & international copyright & trademark law. The legal version of this story can be viewed at https://stocknewstimes.com/2017/07/20/louisiana-state-employees-retirement-system-purchases-1200-shares-of-donaldson-company-inc-nysedci.html. 
A number of research firms have weighed in on DCI. Zacks Investment Research raised Donaldson from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $52.00 price target for the company in a research report on Friday, May 12th. Stifel Nicolaus  reaffirmed a “hold” rating and set a $48.00 price target (up previously from $45.00) on shares of Donaldson in a research report on Friday, June 2nd. BidaskClub raised Donaldson from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a research report on Thursday, July 13th. Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.  reaffirmed a “hold” rating on shares of Donaldson in a research report on Thursday, June 1st. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC raised Donaldson from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $54.00 price target for the company in a research report on Wednesday, May 31st. Four analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and three have assigned  a buy rating to the stock. Donaldson  has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $48.25.
In related news, Director John Wiehoff sold 14,400 shares of Donaldson stock in a transaction that occurred on Tuesday, June 20th. The stock was sold at an average price of $46.33, for a total transaction of $667,152.00. Following the transaction, the director now owns 59,001 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $2,733,516.33. The sale was disclosed in a legal filing with the SEC, which can be accessed through this link. 0.88% of the stock is owned by insiders. 
About Donaldson
Donaldson Company, Inc is a manufacturer of filtration systems and replacement parts. The Company’s segments include Engine Products, Industrial Products and Corporate. The Company’s products are manufactured at approximately 44 plants around the world and through three joint ventures. The Company offers its products under the Ultra-Web, PowerCore and Donaldson brands.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding DCI? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Donaldson Company, Inc. (NYSE:DCI).







Receive News & Ratings for Donaldson Company Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Donaldson Company Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 

















































LASERS – LASERS Benefits Louisiana
















































 

FacebookTwitterYoutube 


A A A  







LASERS BENEFITS LOUISIANALEARN MOREDEFERRED COMPENSATIONWATCH NOW2017 LASERS BOARD OF TRUSTEES ELECTIONLEARN MOREPreviousNext123


ACTIVES

Find information important to you as you navigate your way to retirement. Stay informed and up-to-date with current tools and resources.


RETIREES

Stay current with LASERS news, register for workshops, access your account, and learn the latest on keeping your benefit information current.


EMPLOYERS

Access publications, forms, GASB reporting information, liaison memoranda, employer self-service, and other information that may assist you.



Member’s Guide to Retirement

Register for a Workshop
Estimate Your Benefit
Sign Up for Our Emails
RSEA

 Questions or comments about LASERS? We’d like to hear from you.
Ask LASERS 



Messages From LASERS:PreviousNext 
The 2017 Regular Legislative Session closed with minimal impact to LASERS members. Click to view a wrap-up of the 2017 Session.
 
The LASERS Retiree Workshop will be held on July 26, 2017. Click to register to attend the Retiree Workshop via webinar.
 
Learn about the LASERS Self-Directed Plan on Thursday, August 17, 2017 in Baton Rouge. Click for additional information.
 
The Governor’s Office of Homeland Security has many resources available for preparing for hurricane season. We encourage you to take time to Get a Game Plan.
 
A new report shows that Louisiana’s state pension systems are critical to working families and retirees across the state, and serve as key economic drivers in Louisiana. Click to view the report.
 
View infographics targeted to early career members. These topics cover the basics of LASERS and helps guide you toward a secure financial future.

Did You Know?PreviousNextDeferred CompensationOnly 26% of state employees participate in the Louisiana Public Employees’ Deferred Comp Plan, so that means the other 74% are not taking advantage of a benefit that can make retirement more affordable. Watch our video to learn about the benefits of participating in Deferred Comp to supplement your LASERS retirement.
Maximum Benefit
If you are a retiree with a beneficiary who passed away, you may be eligible to increase your monthly benefit! If the beneficiary you selected to pay a monthly benefit to predeceases you, you should complete Form 10-07, and submit that form to LASERS. 
Unused Leave
A member’s unused annual and sick leave is not calculated when the member enters DROP. It is calculated when the member terminates state service and LASERS finalizes his or her retirement benefit.



Member’s Guide to Retirement
Detailed information about LASERS membership to help you plan for and enjoy your retirement.




   

QUICK LINKS • Fight Fraud
• Go Paperless
• Helpful Links
• Job Openings
• Legislative Information
• Public Records Request
• Rate Our Website
• Vendors

LASERS MAILING ADDRESS:
P.O. Box 44213
Baton Rouge, LA 70804-4213
STREET ADDRESS:
8401 United Plaza Boulevard, 1st Floor
Baton Rouge, LA 70809

BENEFITS Speak to a Retirement Benefits Analyst:
Local: 225.922.0600
Toll-free: 800.256.3000
Fax: 225.935.2856

CONNECT Facebook
Twitter
 YouTube
Privacy Policy
Social Media Policy






















Scroll to top



﻿




























Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Holds Position in Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) - Week Herald














































 















 



  
 
  





















Daily Ratings and News for Roper Technologies Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Roper Technologies Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 






Follow @WeekHerald









Recent Posts

Financial Survey: Iteris (NYSE:ITI) and KVH Industries (KVHI)
Intel Corporation’s (NASDAQ:INTC) Overweight Rating Reaffirmed at Barclays PLC
Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. (NYSE:CMG) Lowered to “Market Perform” at Wedbush
BLB&B Advisors LLC Has $4,341,000 Stake in Western Digital Corporation (WDC)
Church & Dwight Company, Inc. (NYSE:CHD) Receives Average Rating of “Hold” from Brokerages
Franco-Nevada Corporation (NYSE:FNV) Given Average Rating of “Buy” by Brokerages
EPR Properties (NYSE:EPR) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $114.13 Million
FuelCell Energy (FCEL) versus Trina Solar Limited (NYSE:TSL) Financial Analysis
Financial Comparison: CAI International (NYSE:CAI) & Navios Maritime Holdings (NM)
Zayo Group Holdings (NYSE:ZAYO) versus Allot Communications (ALLT) Critical Review
Marcus Corporation (The) (MCS) and Belmond (BEL) Head to Head Analysis
Vertex Pharmaceuticals Incorporated (VRTX) Given Outperform Rating at BMO Capital Markets
Nomura Analysts Give McDonald’s Corporation (MCD) a $172.00 Price Target
PayPal Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:PYPL) Lowered to Hold at SunTrust Banks, Inc.
Wells Fargo & Company (WFC) Rating Lowered to Sell at Berenberg Bank
PPG Industries (PPG) & Axalta Coating Systems (AXTA) Financial Review
Anadarko Petroleum Corporation (APC) Given New $60.00 Price Target at Citigroup Inc.
Fifth Third Bancorp (FITB) Stake Cut by Lynch & Associates IN
Fifth Third Bancorp (FITB) Position Maintained by Mitchell Mcleod Pugh & Williams Inc.
Comparing Glatfelter (GLT) and Neenah Paper (NP)



 


Louisiana State Employees Retirement System Holds Position in Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP)

					Posted by Samantha Guadardo on Jul 22nd, 2017 // No Comments 


Tweet












Louisiana State Employees Retirement System maintained its stake in  Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) during the second quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 6,300 shares of the industrial products company’s stock at the end of the second quarter. Louisiana State Employees Retirement System’s holdings in Roper Technologies were worth $1,459,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Several other hedge funds have also added to or reduced their stakes in ROP. Motco increased its stake in  Roper Technologies by 387.0% in the first quarter. Motco now owns 487 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $101,000 after buying an additional 387 shares during the last quarter.  Independent Portfolio Consultants Inc. increased its stake in  Roper Technologies by 164.7% in the second quarter. Independent Portfolio Consultants Inc. now owns 503 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $116,000 after buying an additional 313 shares during the last quarter.  Northwestern Mutual Wealth Management Co. increased its stake in  Roper Technologies by 9.0% in the first quarter. Northwestern Mutual Wealth Management Co. now owns 618 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $129,000 after buying an additional 51 shares during the last quarter.  Creative Planning increased its stake in  Roper Technologies by 7.7% in the first quarter. Creative Planning now owns 716 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $148,000 after buying an additional 51 shares during the last quarter.  Finally, Quadrant Capital Group LLC increased its stake in  Roper Technologies by 4.1% in the first quarter. Quadrant Capital Group LLC now owns 732 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $147,000 after buying an additional 29 shares during the last quarter. Institutional investors and hedge funds own  96.71% of the company’s stock. 


 Get Roper Technologies Inc. alerts:



Shares of Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE ROP) traded down 0.03% on Friday, reaching $234.77. 285,922 shares of the company were exchanged. Roper Technologies, Inc. has a 12 month low of $159.28 and a 12 month high of $238.49. The stock has a 50 day moving average price of $232.31 and a 200-day moving average price of $213.29. The stock has a market capitalization of $23.95 billion, a P/E ratio of 36.24 and a beta of 1.05. 




Roper Technologies (NYSE:ROP) last announced its earnings results on Friday, April 28th. The industrial products company reported $2.11 EPS for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $1.99 by $0.12. The firm had revenue of $1.09 billion for the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $1.09 billion. Roper Technologies had a net margin of 16.74% and a return on equity of 12.81%. The business’s quarterly revenue was up 20.4% on a year-over-year basis. During the same period last year, the company posted $1.81 EPS.  On average, equities analysts expect that  Roper Technologies, Inc. will post $9.21 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
The firm also recently disclosed a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Friday, July 21st. Stockholders of record on Friday, July 7th were issued a $0.35 dividend. The ex-dividend date  was Wednesday, July 5th. This represents a $1.40 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 0.60%. Roper Technologies’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is presently 21.60%. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: This piece of content was originally  reported by Week Herald and is the sole property of of Week Herald. If you are accessing this piece of content on another website, it was copied illegally and reposted in violation of United States & international copyright legislation. The legal version of this piece of content can be read at https://weekherald.com/2017/07/22/louisiana-state-employees-retirement-system-holds-position-in-roper-technologies-inc-nyserop.html. 
A number of analysts recently commented on the stock. Royal Bank Of Canada  reiterated a “buy” rating and issued a $248.00 target price on shares of Roper Technologies in a report on Wednesday, July 12th. Raymond James Financial, Inc. boosted their price target on shares of Roper Technologies from $253.00 to $268.00 in a report on Wednesday, July 5th. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Roper Technologies from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $259.00 price target on the stock in a report on Tuesday, July 4th. Stifel Nicolaus  restated a “buy” rating and set a $242.00 price target on shares of Roper Technologies in a report on Friday, July 7th. Finally, Barclays PLC cut their price target on shares of Roper Technologies from $223.00 to $221.00 and set an “overweight” rating on the stock in a report on Wednesday, April 19th. Three investment analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and eight have given a buy rating to the stock. Roper Technologies presently has an average rating of “Buy” and a consensus price target of $232.09.
In other news, Director Christopher Wright sold 1,800 shares of Roper Technologies stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, June 9th. The shares were sold at an average price of $228.70, for a total value of $411,660.00. Following the sale, the director now directly owns 66,104 shares in the company, valued at $15,117,984.80. The transaction was disclosed in a filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is available through the SEC website. 2.50% of the stock is owned by company insiders. 
About Roper Technologies








Receive News & Ratings for Roper Technologies Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Roper Technologies Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 























Latest News




Financial Survey: Iteris  and KVH Industries 





Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc.  Lowered to “Market Perform” at Wedbush





BLB&B Advisors LLC Has $4,341,000 Stake in Western Digital Corporation 





Intel Corporation’s  Overweight Rating Reaffirmed at Barclays PLC





Church & Dwight Company, Inc.  Receives Average Rating of “Hold” from Brokerages





Franco-Nevada Corporation  Given Average Rating of “Buy” by Brokerages






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website








 


 

 
































﻿






























Westbourne Investment Advisors Inc. Has $488,000 Stake in Abbott Laboratories (NYSE:ABT) - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Abbott Laboratories

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Abbott Laboratories with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

CytomX Therapeutics, Inc. (NASDAQ:CTMX) Director Frederick W. Gluck Sells 5,000 Shares
Alliancebernstein L.P. Reduces Stake in Lexington Realty Trust (NYSE:LXP)
Wills Financial Group Inc. Has $208,000 Position in Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (TMO)
Zacks: Analysts Expect eGain Corporation (EGAN) Will Announce Quarterly Sales of $13.37 Million
Gabelli Weighs in on General Mills, Inc.’s FY2018 Earnings (GIS)
Flushing Financial Corporation (NASDAQ:FFIC) Issues Quarterly  Earnings Results, Beats Expectations By $0.05 EPS
Amgen Inc. (NASDAQ:AMGN) Issues  Earnings Results
Texas Instruments Incorporated (TXN) Posts  Earnings Results, Beats Expectations By $0.07 EPS
Brokerages Expect Endo International PLC (NASDAQ:ENDP) Will Post Quarterly Sales of $842.14 Million
Kulicke and Soffa Industries (NASDAQ:KLIC) Receiving Positive Press Coverage, Report Shows
Somewhat Positive Press Coverage Somewhat Likely to Affect Realogy Holdings Corp. (NYSE:RLGY) Share Price
Investors Purchase High Volume of Nucor Corporation Call Options (NUE)
Pacholder High Yield Fund (NYSE:PHF) Receiving Favorable Press Coverage, Study Finds
Robert Half International (NYSE:RHI) Earns Daily Coverage Optimism Rating of 0.18
Patterson Companies (PDCO) Receiving Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage, Analysis Shows
Willamette Valley Vineyards, Inc. (WVVI) Director Sells $20,000.00 in Stock
Highway Holdings Limited (HIHO) Posts Quarterly  Earnings Results
Peter P. Radetich Sells 3,000 Shares of Computer Task Group, Incorporated (CTG) Stock
-$0.12 EPS Expected for NovaBay Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NYSE:NBY) This Quarter
Zacks: Segro Plc (NASDAQ:SEGXF) Receives Consensus Recommendation of “Sell” from Brokerages







Westbourne Investment Advisors Inc. Has $488,000 Stake in Abbott Laboratories (NYSE:ABT)


					Posted by Joanna Charbonneau on Jul 18th, 2017 // No Comments




Westbourne Investment Advisors Inc. continued to hold its position in shares of  Abbott Laboratories (NYSE:ABT) during the second quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the SEC. The fund owned 10,030 shares of the healthcare product maker’s stock at the end of the second quarter. Westbourne Investment Advisors Inc.’s holdings in Abbott Laboratories were worth $488,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Several other institutional investors have also recently made changes to their positions in the stock. State Street Corp increased its position in shares of  Abbott Laboratories by 18.9% in the first quarter. State Street Corp now owns 80,499,469 shares of the healthcare product maker’s stock valued at $3,574,987,000 after buying an additional 12,806,535 shares during the period.  Bank of New York Mellon Corp increased its position in shares of  Abbott Laboratories by 11.0% in the first quarter. Bank of New York Mellon Corp now owns 33,796,869 shares of the healthcare product maker’s stock valued at $1,500,920,000 after buying an additional 3,344,508 shares during the period.  Macquarie Group Ltd. increased its position in shares of  Abbott Laboratories by 11.5% in the fourth quarter. Macquarie Group Ltd. now owns 19,694,052 shares of the healthcare product maker’s stock valued at $756,449,000 after buying an additional 2,025,512 shares during the period.  Norges Bank purchased a new position in shares of  Abbott Laboratories during the fourth quarter valued at about $598,897,000.  Finally, Ameriprise Financial Inc. increased its position in shares of  Abbott Laboratories by 33.8% in the first quarter. Ameriprise Financial Inc. now owns 8,823,399 shares of the healthcare product maker’s stock valued at $391,841,000 after buying an additional 2,231,316 shares during the period. 71.02% of the stock is owned by institutional investors. 


 Get Abbott Laboratories alerts:



Abbott Laboratories (ABT) opened at 48.76 on Tuesday. The company has a 50-day moving average price of $46.26 and a 200-day moving average price of $43.65. The stock has a market cap of $84.61 billion, a PE ratio of 50.74 and a beta of 1.06. Abbott Laboratories has a 52 week low of $37.38 and a 52 week high of $49.59. 





Abbott Laboratories (NYSE:ABT) last released its earnings results on Wednesday, April 19th. The healthcare product maker reported $0.48 earnings per share for the quarter, beating the consensus estimate of $0.43 by $0.05. The firm had revenue of $6.34 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $6.16 billion. Abbott Laboratories had a return on equity of 14.91% and a net margin of 6.74%. The company’s quarterly revenue was up 29.7% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the prior year, the firm posted $0.41 earnings per share.  Analysts anticipate that  Abbott Laboratories will post $2.47 earnings per share for the current year. 
The firm also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Tuesday, August 15th. Stockholders of record on Friday, July 14th will be given a dividend of $0.265 per share. This represents a $1.06 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 2.17%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, July 12th. Abbott Laboratories’s dividend payout ratio  is currently 110.42%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: This news story was originally  reported by Chaffey Breeze and is the sole property of of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this news story on another site, it was stolen and reposted in violation of United States & international copyright & trademark law. The legal version of this news story can be viewed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/18/westbourne-investment-advisors-inc-has-488000-stake-in-abbott-laboratories-nyseabt.html. 
ABT has been the topic of a number of recent analyst reports. Cowen and Company  restated an “outperform” rating and set a $48.00 price objective on shares of Abbott Laboratories in a research note on Saturday, April 22nd. Jefferies Group LLC  restated a “buy” rating and set a $58.00 price objective on shares of Abbott Laboratories in a research note on Thursday, June 29th. TheStreet upgraded shares of Abbott Laboratories from a “c+” rating to a “b” rating in a research note on Monday, July 3rd. Zacks Investment Research cut shares of Abbott Laboratories from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research note on Wednesday, May 31st. Finally, Stifel Nicolaus lifted their price objective on shares of Abbott Laboratories from $49.00 to $51.00 and gave the company a “buy” rating in a research note on Wednesday, May 31st. Four analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating, twelve have assigned  a buy rating and one  has assigned  a strong buy rating to the company. The company  has an average rating of “Buy” and an average target price of $51.33.
In other news, insider Jared Watkin sold 552 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Thursday, June 15th. The stock was sold at an average price of $47.97, for a total transaction of $26,479.44. Following the sale, the insider now owns 47,090 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $2,258,907.30. The transaction was disclosed in a legal filing with the SEC, which is available at the SEC website. Also, insider Stephen R. Fussell sold 196,550 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Thursday, June 8th. The stock was sold at an average price of $46.00, for a total value of $9,041,300.00. Following the sale, the insider now directly owns 221,488 shares in the company, valued at approximately $10,188,448. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. In the last ninety days, insiders have sold 206,902 shares of company stock worth $9,497,761. 0.76% of the stock is currently owned by insiders. 
Abbott Laboratories Company Profile
Abbott Laboratories is engaged in the discovery, development, manufacture and sale of a range of healthcare products. The Company operates through four segments: Established Pharmaceutical Products, Diagnostic Products, Nutritional Products and Vascular Products. Its Established Pharmaceutical Products include a range of branded generic pharmaceuticals manufactured around the world and marketed and sold outside the United States.







Receive News & Ratings for Abbott Laboratories Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Abbott Laboratories and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 














































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft





















 Group Life Insurance – State Farm™     








No disponible en español


 
		La página que solicitaste no está disponible en español. Lamentamos cualquier inconveniente.
	



Localiza a un agente

Cancelar













Skip to Main Content




Español



























Menu


Insurance


Insurance Products
Auto
Motorcycles
Sport & Leisure Vehicles
Home & Property
Identity Restoration
Life
Health
Long-Term Care
Disability
Liability
Small Business Insurance





Banking


Banking Products
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
CDs
Credit Cards
Vehicle Loans
Home Mortgage Loans
Home Equity
Bank Rates





Finances


Financial Services
Banking
Loans
Education Savings Plans
Retirement & IRAs
Mutual Funds
Estate Planning
Annuities
Life Insurance
Financial Tools & Resources
Small Business Finances





Claims


Claims Center
File a Claim
Manage Your Claim
Get Roadside Assistance
Claims Help





Customer Care


Customer Care Support
About Us
Need Help?
Find an Agent
Contact Us
Pay Insurance Bills
Manage Your Accounts
Change Your Address
Download Mobile Apps
Simple Insights™
Privacy & Security Center
FAQs
Disclosures
Life Events





Pay Insurance Bills





Login







User ID



Password





Save User ID

 


Register | Forgot your ID or password?




















InsuranceBusiness Owners PoliciesSpecialty LiabilityWorkers' CompensationPremium AuditLoss ControlBusiness AutoSmall Business LifeBusiness ContinuationGroup LifeIdentity RestorationKey Employee IncentivesKey Employee LifeFarm & RanchInland Marine & Mobile PropertySurety & Fidelity BondsFinancesClaims







INSURANCE

Benefit Plans for Your Small Business
      





Group Life Insurance — Life Benefits for Your Business
State Farm™ has a Group Life insurance plan that offers benefits for both you and your employees.
As an employer, you are aware of the importance of employee benefits and their contribution to your business success. State Farm can establish a plan for employee groups of five or more in all states except Massachusetts and Rhode Island. For additional information including eligibility requirements, contact your State Farm agent.




Find an  Agent






















Advantages to the Employer

Federal income-tax deductible premiums
Desirable fringe benefit to offer new employees
Reduced turnover, saving you money in hiring and training costs
Contributes to employee security, loyalty, and higher morale
Valuable life insurance protection provided at a low group rate

Advantages to the Employee

Valuable life insurance protection provided at a low group rate
Right to name and change beneficiaries at any time
Waiver of Premium for Disability Benefit rider is provided at no extra cost

Your State Farm agent will complete a factfinder to gather information about your business and your objectives for a group life plan. Based on the information, a proposal will be prepared for you to consider.
 






Related Links


Business life insurance
Business continuation
Key employees
Key employee incentives



 



Disclosure

This brief overview of the State Farm Commercial Group Life Plan is not intended to be a complete explanation of plan features. For more detailed information and state exceptions, please contact your State Farm agent.
Neither State Farm nor its agents provide tax or legal advice.





 













          Print
        

          Email
        




            Facebook
          





            Twitter
          

            Tweet
          



            Google +
          










 



Need Help?Contact UsAbout UsCareersRetireesSmall Business SolutionsOther State Farm Sites:State Farm CanadaBusiness to BusinessSite MapAbout Our Ads & TrackingAccessibilityTerms of UseNotice of Privacy PolicySecurity© Copyright, State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company, 2017.FacebookTwitterGoogle PlusYouTubeLinkedInFlickrSSL
     

Footnote Modal Close


  Find State Farm® Agents Near You - State Farm®   


 


 
 Updating...  errorWe noticed some missing or incomplete information. Please add the requested information. 



No disponible en español


 
		La página que solicitaste no está disponible en español. Lamentamos cualquier inconveniente.
	



Localiza a un agente

Cancelar













Skip to Main Content




En Español



























Menu


Insurance


Insurance Products
Auto
Motorcycles
Sport & Leisure Vehicles
Home & Property
Identity Restoration
Life
Health
Long-Term Care
Disability
Liability
Small Business Insurance





Banking


Banking Products
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
CDs
Credit Cards
Vehicle Loans
Home Mortgage Loans
Home Equity
Bank Rates





Finances


Financial Services
Banking
Loans
Education Savings Plans
Retirement & IRAs
Mutual Funds
Estate Planning
Annuities
Life Insurance
Financial Tools & Resources
Small Business Finances





Claims


Claims Center
File a Claim
Manage Your Claim
Get Roadside Assistance
Claims Help





Customer Care


Customer Care Support
About Us
Need Help?
Find an Agent
Contact Us
Pay Insurance Bills
Manage Your Accounts
Change Your Address
Download Mobile Apps
Simple Insights™
Privacy & Security Center
FAQs
Disclosures
Life Events





Pay Insurance Bills





Login







User ID



Password





Save User ID

 


Register | Forgot your ID or password?















Find a State Farm AgentAll fields are required unless otherwise noted as optional.


 warningWe noticed some missing or incomplete information. Please add the requested information. 


 errorWe noticed some missing or incomplete information. Please add the requested information. 




Search







 Location   (address, city, state and/or ZIP) 







Did you mean









 Distance  (optional) 


 Within 100 miles Within 90 miles Within 80 miles Within 70 miles Within 60 miles Within 50 miles Within 40 miles Within 30 miles Within 20 miles Within 10 miles





 Language  (optional) 


 English Spanish Portuguese Chinese French German Italian






 Agent first name  (optional) 






 Agent last name  (optional) 








 Products Offered / Serviced  (optional) 


 Select Product... Auto Home Property Business Life Health Banking Annuities




 Search




– of  Agents  | Showing:   PreviousNext


 View Map

  View List













– of  Agents  | Showing:   PreviousNext






Disclosures


To find the location and learn more about the registered agents, click to visit their site. Before investing, consider the investment objectives, risks, fees and expenses of the funds. Contact State Farm VP Management Corp. (1-800-447-4930) or visit your registered State Farm agent for a mutual fund prospectus or summary prospectus or The State Farm College Savings Enrollment Handbook and Participation Agreement containing this and other information. Read it carefully.


State Farm VP Management Corp.
			 Risk/Important Disclosures.



 State Farm Mutual Funds Prospectus.



 The State Farm College Savings Plan Enrollment Handbook  (PDF 520 KB). 


Neither State Farm nor its agents provide investment, tax, or legal advice. Securities, insurance and annuity products are not FDIC insured, are not bank guaranteed and are subject to investment risk, including possible loss of principal. State Farm VP Management Corp. is a separate entity from those State Farm entities which provide banking and insurance products. AP2013/04/1078 



Learn about mutual funds



Investment options


Prices Performance


Distributions


Tax Center


Tax Relief in Disaster Situations







Disclosures


To find the location and learn more about a registered representative, click to visit their site.


Mutual Funds are not insurance products and are distributed through representatives of State Farm Investor Services (Canada) Co. State Farm Investor Services (Canada) Co. is a separate legal entity from State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company, or any of its insurance affiliates.
			 
 

 
 Please read the applicable simplified prospectus before investing. Commissions, trailing commissions, management fees, and expenses may be associated with mutual fund investments. 


 
 Mutual Funds are not guaranteed, their values change frequently and past performance may not be repeated. Mutual fund securities are not covered by the Canada Deposit Insurance Corporation or by any other government deposit insurer.  



Neither State Farm nor its agents provide tax or legal advice. Please consult a tax or legal advisor for advice regarding your personal circumstances.  


State Farm Investor Services (Canada) Co. Aurora, Ontario 




Learn about mutual funds



What is a Mutual Fund?


Retirement Illustrated Calculator


Your Financial Strategy


Insurance and Financial Review


Knowing Your Retirement ABCs







View agents in the United States by State 

 Print  Email  Facebook  Twitter  Tweet  Google + 








US



Need Help?Contact UsAbout UsCareersRetireesSmall Business SolutionsOther State Farm Sites:State Farm CanadaBusiness to BusinessSite MapAbout Our Ads & TrackingAccessibilityTerms of UseNotice of Privacy PolicySecurity© Copyright, State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company, 2017.FacebookTwitterGoogle PlusYouTubeLinkedInFlickrSSL
     

  

 

  Find State Farm® Agents Near You - State Farm®   


 


 
 Updating...  errorWe noticed some missing or incomplete information. Please add the requested information. 



No disponible en español


 
		La página que solicitaste no está disponible en español. Lamentamos cualquier inconveniente.
	



Localiza a un agente

Cancelar













Skip to Main Content




En Español



























Menu


Insurance


Insurance Products
Auto
Motorcycles
Sport & Leisure Vehicles
Home & Property
Identity Restoration
Life
Health
Long-Term Care
Disability
Liability
Small Business Insurance





Banking


Banking Products
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
CDs
Credit Cards
Vehicle Loans
Home Mortgage Loans
Home Equity
Bank Rates





Finances


Financial Services
Banking
Loans
Education Savings Plans
Retirement & IRAs
Mutual Funds
Estate Planning
Annuities
Life Insurance
Financial Tools & Resources
Small Business Finances





Claims


Claims Center
File a Claim
Manage Your Claim
Get Roadside Assistance
Claims Help





Customer Care


Customer Care Support
About Us
Need Help?
Find an Agent
Contact Us
Pay Insurance Bills
Manage Your Accounts
Change Your Address
Download Mobile Apps
Simple Insights™
Privacy & Security Center
FAQs
Disclosures
Life Events





Pay Insurance Bills





Login







User ID



Password





Save User ID

 


Register | Forgot your ID or password?















Find a State Farm AgentAll fields are required unless otherwise noted as optional.


 warningWe noticed some missing or incomplete information. Please add the requested information. 


 errorWe noticed some missing or incomplete information. Please add the requested information. 




Search







 Location   (address, city, state and/or ZIP) 







Did you mean









 Distance  (optional) 


 Within 100 miles Within 90 miles Within 80 miles Within 70 miles Within 60 miles Within 50 miles Within 40 miles Within 30 miles Within 20 miles Within 10 miles





 Language  (optional) 


 English Spanish Portuguese Chinese French German Italian






 Agent first name  (optional) 






 Agent last name  (optional) 








 Products Offered / Serviced  (optional) 


 Select Product... Auto Home Property Business Life Health Banking Annuities




 Search




– of  Agents  | Showing:   PreviousNext


 View Map

  View List













– of  Agents  | Showing:   PreviousNext






Disclosures


To find the location and learn more about the registered agents, click to visit their site. Before investing, consider the investment objectives, risks, fees and expenses of the funds. Contact State Farm VP Management Corp. (1-800-447-4930) or visit your registered State Farm agent for a mutual fund prospectus or summary prospectus or The State Farm College Savings Enrollment Handbook and Participation Agreement containing this and other information. Read it carefully.


State Farm VP Management Corp.
			 Risk/Important Disclosures.



 State Farm Mutual Funds Prospectus.



 The State Farm College Savings Plan Enrollment Handbook  (PDF 520 KB). 


Neither State Farm nor its agents provide investment, tax, or legal advice. Securities, insurance and annuity products are not FDIC insured, are not bank guaranteed and are subject to investment risk, including possible loss of principal. State Farm VP Management Corp. is a separate entity from those State Farm entities which provide banking and insurance products. AP2013/04/1078 



Learn about mutual funds



Investment options


Prices Performance


Distributions


Tax Center


Tax Relief in Disaster Situations







Disclosures


To find the location and learn more about a registered representative, click to visit their site.


Mutual Funds are not insurance products and are distributed through representatives of State Farm Investor Services (Canada) Co. State Farm Investor Services (Canada) Co. is a separate legal entity from State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company, or any of its insurance affiliates.
			 
 

 
 Please read the applicable simplified prospectus before investing. Commissions, trailing commissions, management fees, and expenses may be associated with mutual fund investments. 


 
 Mutual Funds are not guaranteed, their values change frequently and past performance may not be repeated. Mutual fund securities are not covered by the Canada Deposit Insurance Corporation or by any other government deposit insurer.  



Neither State Farm nor its agents provide tax or legal advice. Please consult a tax or legal advisor for advice regarding your personal circumstances.  


State Farm Investor Services (Canada) Co. Aurora, Ontario 




Learn about mutual funds



What is a Mutual Fund?


Retirement Illustrated Calculator


Your Financial Strategy


Insurance and Financial Review


Knowing Your Retirement ABCs







View agents in the United States by State 

 Print  Email  Facebook  Twitter  Tweet  Google + 








US



Need Help?Contact UsAbout UsCareersRetireesSmall Business SolutionsOther State Farm Sites:State Farm CanadaBusiness to BusinessSite MapAbout Our Ads & TrackingAccessibilityTerms of UseNotice of Privacy PolicySecurity© Copyright, State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company, 2017.FacebookTwitterGoogle PlusYouTubeLinkedInFlickrSSL
     

  

 












 Small Business Insurance – State Farm™     








No disponible en español


 
		La página que solicitaste no está disponible en español. Lamentamos cualquier inconveniente.
	



Localiza a un agente

Cancelar













Skip to Main Content




Español



























Menu


Insurance


Insurance Products
Auto
Motorcycles
Sport & Leisure Vehicles
Home & Property
Identity Restoration
Life
Health
Long-Term Care
Disability
Liability
Small Business Insurance





Banking


Banking Products
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
CDs
Credit Cards
Vehicle Loans
Home Mortgage Loans
Home Equity
Bank Rates





Finances


Financial Services
Banking
Loans
Education Savings Plans
Retirement & IRAs
Mutual Funds
Estate Planning
Annuities
Life Insurance
Financial Tools & Resources
Small Business Finances





Claims


Claims Center
File a Claim
Manage Your Claim
Get Roadside Assistance
Claims Help





Customer Care


Customer Care Support
About Us
Need Help?
Find an Agent
Contact Us
Pay Insurance Bills
Manage Your Accounts
Change Your Address
Download Mobile Apps
Simple Insights™
Privacy & Security Center
FAQs
Disclosures
Life Events





Pay Insurance Bills





Login







User ID



Password





Save User ID

 


Register | Forgot your ID or password?

















SMALL BUSINESS SOLUTIONS

Helping Your Small Business Succeed
      










InsuranceBusiness Owners PoliciesSpecialty LiabilityWorkers' CompensationPremium AuditLoss ControlBusiness AutoSmall Business LifeFarm & RanchInland Marine & Mobile PropertySurety & Fidelity BondsFinancesClaims





Small Business Insurance to Fit Your Needs
We know your business means everything to you. It's also important to us. As an owner of a growing business, you face tough challenges every day. Make sure your business has adequate insurance protection.
Like you, State Farm agents are small business owners and understand the importance of developing a plan for continued financial security. Your local State Farm agent can work with you to determine a blend of business insurance products and provide business insurance quotes specifically for you.




Find an  Agent



























Business Owners Policies
We offer coverage for many types of businesses. Find yours and learn how State Farm small business insurance is tailored to meet your needs.

Learn more about Business Insurance







Business Auto Insurance
Whether you use your own car or a fleet of trucks, we offer the protection for your business vehicles. We can help you determine what deductible and coverage limits best fit your business.
Learn more about Business Auto Insurance
 







Business and Professional Liability Insurance
State Farm can help protect your business from costly legal fees and judgments that come from claims of professional negligence, error, or omission.
Learn more about Professional Liability Insurance






Surety & Fidelity Bonds

			A fidelity or surety bond can help protect the interests of your growing business. Whether you are required to post a bond due to licensing requirements with municipalities, or need a surety bond to guarantee payment for state sales taxes or utility bills, we can help.
		

Learn more about Surety & Fidelity Bonds

 




Loss Control Services and Resources


We're here with free resources to help you identify and mitigate some of the most common causes of business losses.
Learn more about Loss Control













Start a Claim


Business Insurance Claims
Workers Compensation Claims
Workers Compensation Claims Kit
Report Workers Compensation Claim
Auto Insurance Claim








Business Resources


Consider This When Starting a Business
Disaster Planning for Your Business
Preventing Employee Theft
Protecting Your Business Equipment
Protect Your Business from Burglary








Industry Links


Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration (FMCSA)
National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA)
Insurance Institute for Highway Safety (IIHS)
Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)



 



Disclosure

This is only a general description of coverages of the available types of business insurance and is not a statement of contract. Details of coverage, limits, or services may not be available for all business and vary in some states. All coverages are subject to the terms, provisions, exclusions, and conditions in the policy itself and in any endorsements. 



State Farm (including State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company and its subsidiaries and affiliates) is not responsible for, and does not endorse or approve, either implicitly or explicitly, the content of any third party sites hyperlinked from this page. State Farm has no discretion to alter, update, or control the content on the hyperlinked, third party site. Access to third party sites is at the user's own risk, is being provided for informational purposes only and is not a solicitation to buy or sell any of the products which may be referenced on such third party sites. 



 













          Print
        

          Email
        




            Facebook
          





            Twitter
          

            Tweet
          



            Google +
          










 



Need Help?Contact UsAbout UsCareersRetireesSmall Business SolutionsOther State Farm Sites:State Farm CanadaBusiness to BusinessSite MapAbout Our Ads & TrackingAccessibilityTerms of UseNotice of Privacy PolicySecurity© Copyright, State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company, 2017.FacebookTwitterGoogle PlusYouTubeLinkedInFlickrSSL
     

Footnote Modal Close













 Business Owners Policies (BOP Insurance) – State Farm™     








No disponible en español


 
		La página que solicitaste no está disponible en español. Lamentamos cualquier inconveniente.
	



Localiza a un agente

Cancelar













Skip to Main Content




Español



























Menu


Insurance


Insurance Products
Auto
Motorcycles
Sport & Leisure Vehicles
Home & Property
Identity Restoration
Life
Health
Long-Term Care
Disability
Liability
Small Business Insurance





Banking


Banking Products
Checking Accounts
Savings Accounts
CDs
Credit Cards
Vehicle Loans
Home Mortgage Loans
Home Equity
Bank Rates





Finances


Financial Services
Banking
Loans
Education Savings Plans
Retirement & IRAs
Mutual Funds
Estate Planning
Annuities
Life Insurance
Financial Tools & Resources
Small Business Finances





Claims


Claims Center
File a Claim
Manage Your Claim
Get Roadside Assistance
Claims Help





Customer Care


Customer Care Support
About Us
Need Help?
Find an Agent
Contact Us
Pay Insurance Bills
Manage Your Accounts
Change Your Address
Download Mobile Apps
Simple Insights™
Privacy & Security Center
FAQs
Disclosures
Life Events





Pay Insurance Bills





Login







User ID



Password





Save User ID

 


Register | Forgot your ID or password?




















InsuranceBusiness Owners PoliciesSpecialty LiabilityWorkers' CompensationPremium AuditLoss ControlBusiness AutoSmall Business LifeFarm & RanchInland Marine & Mobile PropertySurety & Fidelity BondsFinancesClaims







INSURANCE

There to Protect Your Business
      





Business Owners Policies (BOP) to Cover Your Business Needs
Purchasing business owners policies from State Farm is designed to be simple. We offer the protection you need at a reasonable price. Our agents are small business owners just like you and can recommend coverages that fit your business needs. Talk to a State Farm™ agent today about our BOP insurance to see how we can help you protect the business you've worked hard to build.




Find an  Agent























Condominium Associations


Business Condominium and Residential Community Associations
Simplify with a master policy from State Farm™. Business Condominium and Residential Community Association insurance can insure all the building and common elements under a single package policy.
Learn more about:

Business Condominium Association Insurance
Residential Community Association Insurance

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Contractors and Home Service


With a State Farm™ policy tailored to meet your specific needs, you can get the property and liability protection that's right for you. There's a long list of contractor businesses we insure.
Learn more about:

Artisan and Service Contractor's Insurance (such as plumbing, drywall, painting, electrical, and HVAC services)
Business Owners Insurance for Home Services (such as locksmiths and piano tuning)

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Distributors and Wholesale


Whether you do route sales or distribute beverages, magazines, or janitorial supplies, we can help protect your building, property, and loss of income. We're here with business liability and medical expense coverage too.
Learn more about:

Distributors and Wholesale Insurance (such as household product distributor, mail order houses, farm supply stores)
Business Owners Insurance (such as newspaper and magazine distributors)

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Food Shops and Restaurants


From candy to coffee — deli, bakery, pizza and more — we can help your food business navigate a variety of business challenges. Whether you're into big plates or small bites, talk to an agent about your food service insurance needs.
Learn more about:

Food Shops Insurance (such as candy stores, delis, bakeries, and fast food)
Restaurant Insurance — Whether you're a table-service restaurant serving big steaks or smaller bites, talk to an agent about your restaurant insurance needs.

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Landlord — Residential and Business


Whether you own apartments, motels, condominiums or warehouse space, we're committed to helping you find a policy that's best for you.
Learn more about:

Apartment Owners Insurance
Business Owners Insurance (includes motels, business condo unitowners, business offices, warehouses, rented spaces, or buildings under construction)

Artisan and Service Contractors Insurance (includes spaces rented to Contractors)

Builder's Risk Insurance (includes buildings under construction, whether an apartment complex or a new mall)

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Medical


For doctors, dentists, chiropractors, optometrists, acupuncturists and others, State Farm™ provides coverage that can help your business through challenges such as fire or vandalism, a customer lawsuit, business shutdown, or loss/destruction of business documents.
Learn more about:

Medical Office Insurance

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Nonprofit Organizations


Your nonprofit has many of the same risks as a commercial business. You have buildings, people, and property to protect. A State Farm™ agent can help you cover the bases with just the right insurance for your unique needs.
Learn more about:

State Farm Business Owners Insurance

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Personal Services and Animal Care


As a personal service business, customers come see you to get the car checked, squeeze in a workout, pick up the dry cleaning, get their hair done, or drop their pup off for some pampering. No matter which service is your business, we're ready to help.
Learn more about:

Auto Services Insurance (such as car washes and automobile service shops)
Animal Care Services Insurance
Barber Shop, Beauty Salons, Day Spas and Cosmetic Stores Insurance
Business Owners Insurance (such as fitness studios, art galleries and dealers, tailoring and alterations, and photography)
Dry Cleaning and Laundering Insurance

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Professional Services


The list of office-based professional services we insure is a (very) long one. Some examples include: lawyers, appraisers, accountants, architects, graphic artists, insurance agents (our favorite), and laboratories.
Learn more about:

Business Owners Insurance (such as appraisers and surveyors)
Office Insurance (such as architects, engineers, consultants, attorneys, insurance agents, brokers, and accountants)

Medical Office Insurance (laboratories)

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Religious Organizations


We understand that your place of worship is also the center of your community. That's why our agents are committed to helping you find a reliable insurance plan for the protection you need if the unexpected happens.
Learn more about:

Religious Organizations Insurance

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Retail


We help protect an extensive array of retail businesses. From clothing to toys to antiques to fine art, we've got you covered. Depending on the type of business you have, you can connect with more information about our Business Owner and Retail Shops insurance here.
Learn more about:

Business Owners Insurance (such as antique stores, beer and wine stores, convenience stores, and vending machine operations)
Drugstore and Pharmacy Insurance
Home Product Sales Insurance (such as appliance and computer sales, furniture and home improvement stores)
Florist Insurance
Grocery Store Insurance
Retail Shops Insurance (such as auto parts, bridal shops, clothing stores, gift shops, shoe stores, toy stores, and sporting goods stores)

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 



Specialty Schools


Whether your school feeds our creative side (art, pottery, music/acting/dance) or our career goals, we have business insurance options tailored just for you.
Learn more about:

State Farm Business Owners Insurance

Talk to an agent or check out our Business Insurance Directory to learn more about the types of businesses we insure.
 


Business Insurance Directory
For a full list of the many types of businesses and organizations State Farm™ insures, check out our Business Insurance Directory.
In addition to your business property insurance needs, you may also want to consider commercial liability umbrella, commercial auto, workers' compensation, business life, retirement plans, and professional/specialty products insurance.
 




Loss Control Services and Resources


We're here with free resources to help you identify and mitigate some of the most common causes of business losses.
Learn more about Loss Control













Start a Claim


Business Insurance Claims
Workers Compensation Claims
Workers Compensation Claims Kit
Report Workers Compensation Claim
Auto Insurance Claim








Business Resources


Consider This When Starting a Business
Disaster Planning for Your Business
Preventing Employee Theft
Protecting Your Business Equipment
Protect Your Business from Burglary








Industry Links


Flood insurance for your business
Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety (IBHS)
Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)



 



Disclosure

This is only a general description of coverages of the available types of business insurance and is not a statement of contract. Details of coverage, limits, or services may not be available for all business and vary in some states. All coverages are subject to the terms, provisions, exclusions, and conditions in the policy itself and in any endorsements. Contact a State Farm agent for more information and a customized quote.State Farm (including State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company and its subsidiaries and affiliates) is not responsible for, and does not endorse or approve, either implicitly or explicitly, the content of any third party sites hyperlinked from this page. State Farm has no discretion to alter, update, or control the content on the hyperlinked, third party site. Access to third party sites is at the user's own risk, is being provided for informational purposes only and is not a solicitation to buy or sell any of the products which may be referenced on such third party sites. 



 













          Print
        

          Email
        




            Facebook
          





            Twitter
          

            Tweet
          



            Google +
          










 



Need Help?Contact UsAbout UsCareersRetireesSmall Business SolutionsOther State Farm Sites:State Farm CanadaBusiness to BusinessSite MapAbout Our Ads & TrackingAccessibilityTerms of UseNotice of Privacy PolicySecurity© Copyright, State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Company, 2017.FacebookTwitterGoogle PlusYouTubeLinkedInFlickrSSL
     

Footnote Modal Close

